This Platform collects some Personal Data from its Users. This Privacy Policy has a section dedicated to Californian consumers and their privacy rights. This Privacy Policy can be printed for reference by using the print command in the settings of any browser.
Owner and Data Controller
EWINGS LLC
1st Floor, CI Tower, PO Box 32932, Al Bateen Street, Abu Dhabi, UAE
DPO Contact
48th Floor, U-Bora Tower, Business Bay, Dubai, P.O. Box 57240, UAE
DPO contact email:
dpo@ewings.ae
Owner contact email:
customer.support@mahzooz.ae
Definitions
Cookies
Small sets of data stored in the User's device.
Data Controller (or Owner)
The natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Data, including the security measures concerning the operation and use of This Platform. The Data Controller, unless otherwise speciﬁed, is the Owner of This Platform.
Data Processor (or Data Supervisor)
The natural or legal person, public authority, agency, or other body which processes Personal Data on behalf of the Controller, as described in this privacy policy.
Data Subject
The natural person to whom the Personal Data refers.
European Union (or EU)
Unless otherwise speciﬁed, all references made within this document to the European Union include all current member states to the European Union and the European Economic Area.
Personal Data (or Data)
Any information that directly, indirectly, or in connection with other information — including a personal identiﬁcation number — allows for the identiﬁcation or identiﬁability of a natural person.
Service
The service provided by This Platform as described in the relative terms (if available) and on this site/application.
This Platform (or this Application)
The means by which the Personal Data of the User is collected and processed.
Usage Data
Information collected automatically through This Platform (or third-party services employed in This Platform), which can include: the IP addresses or domain names of the computers utilised by the Users who use This Platform, the URI addresses (Uniform Resource Identiﬁer), the time of the request, the method utilised to submit the request to the server, the size of the ﬁle received in response, the numerical code indicating the status of the server's answer (successful outcome, error, etc.), the country of origin, the features of the browser and the operating system utilised by the User, the various time details per visit (e.g., the time spent on each page within the Application) and the details about the path followed within the Application with special reference to the sequence of pages visited, and other parameters about the device operating system and/or the User's IT environment.
User
The individual using This Platform who, unless otherwise speciﬁed, coincides with the Data Subject.
This privacy statement has been prepared based on provisions of multiple legislations, including Art. 13/14 of Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (General Data Protection Regulation).
This privacy policy relates solely to This Platform, if not stated otherwise within this document.
Latest update: 27 September 2021
Types of Data Collected
Among the types of Personal Data that This Platform collects, by itself or through third parties, there are: email address; Usage Data; ﬁrst name; last name; phone number; Cookies; unique device identiﬁers for advertising (Google Advertiser ID or IDFA, for example); geographic position.
Complete details on each type of Personal Data collected are provided in the dedicated sections of this privacy policy or by speciﬁc explanation texts displayed prior to the Data collection.
Personal Data may be freely provided by the User, or, in case of Usage Data, collected automatically when using This Platform.
Unless speciﬁed otherwise, all Data requested by This Platform is mandatory and failure to provide this Data may make it impossible for This Platform to provide its services. In cases where This Platform speciﬁcally states that some Data is not mandatory, Users are free not to communicate this Data without consequences to the availability or the functioning of the Service.
Users who are uncertain about which Personal Data is mandatory are welcome to contact the Owner.
Any use of Cookies, or of other tracking tools, by This Platform or by the owners of third-party services used by This Platform serves the purpose of providing the Service required by the User, in addition to any other purposes described in the present document and in the Cookie Policy, if available.
Users are responsible for any third-party Personal Data obtained, published, or shared through This Platform and conﬁrm that they have the third party's consent to provide the Data to the Owner.
Mode and Place of Processing the Data
Methods of Processing
The Owner takes appropriate security measures to prevent unauthorised access, disclosure, modiﬁcation, or unauthorised destruction of the Data.
The Data processing is carried out using computers and/or IT enabled tools, following organisational procedures and modes strictly related to the purposes indicated. In addition to the Owner, in some cases, the Data may be accessible to certain types of persons in charge, involved with the operation of This Platform (administration, sales, marketing, legal and compliance, system administration) or external parties (such as third-party technical service providers, mail carriers, hosting providers, IT companies, communications agencies, risk intelligence providers, jackpot insurance providers) appointed, if necessary, as Data Processors by the Owner. The updated list of these parties may be requested from the Owner at any time.
Legal Basis of Processing
The Owner may process Personal Data relating to Users if one of the following applies:
Users have given their consent for one or more speciﬁc purposes. Note: Under some legislations the Owner may be allowed to process Personal Data until the User objects to such processing ("opt-out"), without having to rely on consent or any other of the following legal bases. This, however, does not apply, whenever the processing of Personal Data is subject to European data protection law;
provision of Data is necessary for the performance of an agreement with the User and/or for any pre-contractual obligations thereof; processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which the Owner is subject;
processing is related to a task that is carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of ofﬁcial authority vested in the Owner; processing is necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by the Owner or by a third party.
In any case, the Owner will gladly help to clarify the speciﬁc legal basis that applies to the processing, and in particular whether the provision of Personal Data is a statutory or contractual requirement, or a requirement necessary to enter into a contract.
Place
The Data is processed at the Owner's operating ofﬁces and in any other places where the parties involved in the processing are located.
Depending on the User's location, data transfers may involve transferring the User's Data to a country other than their own. To ﬁnd out more about the place of processing of such transferred Data, Users can check the section containing details about the processing of Personal Data.
Users are also entitled to learn about the legal basis of Data transfers to a country outside the European Union or to any international organisation governed by public international law or set up by two or more countries, such as the UN, and about the security measures taken by the Owner to safeguard their Data.
If any such transfer takes place, Users can ﬁnd out more by checking the relevant sections of this document or inquire with the Owner using the information provided in the contact section.
Retention Time
Personal Data shall be processed and stored for as long as required by the purpose they have been collected for. Therefore:
Personal Data collected for purposes related to the performance of a contract between the Owner and the User shall be retained until such contract has been fully performed.
Personal Data collected for the purposes of the Owner's legitimate interests shall be retained as long as needed to fulﬁl such purposes. Users may ﬁnd speciﬁc information regarding the legitimate interests pursued by the Owner within the relevant sections of this document or by contacting the Owner.
The Owner may be allowed to retain Personal Data for a longer period whenever the User has given consent to such processing, as long as such consent is not withdrawn. Furthermore, the Owner may be obliged to retain Personal Data for a longer period whenever required to do so for the performance of a legal obligation or upon order of an authority.
Once the retention period expires, Personal Data shall be deleted. Therefore, the right to access, the right to erasure, the right to rectiﬁcation and the right to data portability cannot be enforced after expiration of the retention period.
The Purposes of Processing
The Data concerning the User is collected to allow the Owner to provide its Service, comply with its legal obligations, respond to enforcement requests, protect its rights and interests (or those of its Users or third parties), detect any malicious or fraudulent activity, as well as the following: Managing contacts and sending messages, Hosting and backend infrastructure, Platform services and hosting, Contacting the User, Advertising, Analytics, Displaying content from external platforms, SPAM protection, User database management, Handling payments, Location-based interactions and Tag Management.
For speciﬁc information about the Personal Data used for each purpose, the User may refer to the section "Detailed Information on the Processing of Personal Data".
Detailed Information on the Processing of Personal Data
Personal Data is collected for the following purposes and using the following services:
Advertising
This type of service allows User Data to be utilised for advertising communication purposes. These communications are displayed in the form of banners and other advertisements on This Platform, possibly based on User interests.
This does not mean that all Personal Data are used for this purpose. Information and conditions of use are shown below.
Some of the services listed below may use Cookies or other Identiﬁers to identify Users or they may use the behavioural retargeting technique, i.e. displaying ads tailored to the User's interests and behaviour, including those detected outside This Platform. For more information, please check the privacy policies of the relevant services.
In addition to any opt-out feature offered by any of the services below, Users may opt out by visiting the
Network Advertising Initiative opt-out page
.
Users may also opt-out of certain advertising features through applicable device settings, such as the device advertising settings for mobile phones or ads settings in general.
Analytics
The services contained in this section enable the Owner to monitor and analyse web trafﬁc and can be used to keep track of User behaviour.
Google Analytics (Google LLC)
Google Analytics is a web analysis service provided by Google LLC ("
Google
"). Google utilises the Data collected to track and examine the use of This Platform, to prepare reports on its activities and share them with other Google services.
Google may use the Data collected to contextualise and personalise the ads of its own advertising network.
Personal Data processed: Cookies; Usage Data.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
-
Opt-Out
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
Google Analytics Advertising Reporting Features (Google LLC)
Google Analytics on This Platform has Advertising Reporting Features activated, which collects additional information from the DoubleClick cookie (web activity) and from device advertising IDs (app activity). It allows the Owner to analyse speciﬁc behaviour and interests Data (trafﬁc Data and Users' ads interaction Data) and, if enabled, demographic Data (information about the age and gender).
Users can opt out of Google's use of cookies by visiting Google's
Ads Settings
.
Personal Data processed: Cookies; unique device identiﬁers for advertising (Google Advertiser ID or IDFA, for example); various types of Data as speciﬁed in the privacy policy of the service.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
–
Opt-Out
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: identiﬁers; internet information.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
Contacting the User
Contact form (This Platform)
By ﬁlling in the contact form with their Data, the User authorises This Platform to use these details to reply to requests for information, quotes or any other kind of request as indicated by the form's header.
Personal Data processed: email address; ﬁrst name; last name; phone number.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: identiﬁers.
Phone contact (This Platform)
Users that provided their phone number might be contacted for commercial or promotional purposes related to This Platform, as well as for fulﬁlling support requests.
Personal Data processed: phone number.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: identiﬁers.
Displaying Content From External Platforms
This type of service allows you to view content hosted on external platforms directly from the pages of This Platform and interact with them. This type of service might still collect web trafﬁc data for the pages where the service is installed, even when Users do not use it.
Google Fonts (Google LLC)
Google Fonts is a typeface visualisation service provided by Google LLC that allows This Platform to incorporate content of this kind on its pages.
Personal Data processed: Usage Data; various types of Data as speciﬁed in the privacy policy of the service.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
YouTube video widget (Google LLC)
YouTube is a video content visualisation service provided by Google LLC that allows This Platform to incorporate content of this kind on its pages. Personal Data processed: Cookies; Usage Data.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
Handling Payments
Unless otherwise speciﬁed, This Platform processes any payments by credit card, bank transfer or other means via external payment service providers. In general, and unless where otherwise stated, Users are requested to provide their payment details and personal information directly to such payment service providers. This Platform is not involved in the collection and processing of such information: instead, it will only receive a notiﬁcation by the relevant payment service provider as to whether payment has been successfully completed.
Network International Payment Solutions
Place of processing: UAE –
Privacy Policy
First Abu Dhabi Bank
Place of processing: UAE –
Privacy Policy
Paying Prizes
If you are a prize winner, we will use personal and ﬁnancial information you provide to us for anti-money laundering and payment processing, including sharing with our payment providers and jackpot insurance provider.
Refinitiv World-Check Risk Intelligence
World-Check is a risk intelligence database that is used to identify and manage financial, regulatory, and reputational risk and comply with Anti-Money Laundering regulations. The personal data collected will be used to screen against sanction lists, law enforcement watchlists, and lists of politically exposed persons (PEPs).
Place of processing – [United Kingdom] –
Privacy Statement
Hosting and Backend Infrastructure
This type of service has the purpose of hosting Data and ﬁles that enable This Platform to run and be distributed as well as to provide a ready-made infrastructure to run speciﬁc features or parts of This Platform.
Some services among those listed below, if any, may work through geographically distributed servers, making it difﬁcult to determine the actual location where the Personal Data are stored.
Amazon Web Services (AWS) (Amazon Web Services, Inc.)
Amazon Web Services (AWS) is a hosting and backend service provided by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Personal Data processed: various types of Data as speciﬁed in the privacy policy of the service.
Place of processing: India –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
Location-Based Interactions
Non-continuous geolocation (This Platform)
This Platform may collect, use, and share User location Data in order to provide location-based services.
Most browsers and devices provide tools to opt out from this feature by default. If explicit authorisation has been provided, the User's location data may be tracked by This Platform.
The geographic location of the User is determined in a manner that isn't continuous, either at the speciﬁc request of the User or when the User doesn't point out its current location in the appropriate ﬁeld and allows the application to detect the position automatically.
Personal Data processed: geographic position.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: geolocation data.
Managing Contacts and Sending Messages
This type of service makes it possible to manage a database of email contacts, phone contacts or any other contact information to communicate with the User.
These services may also collect data concerning the date and time when the message was viewed by the User, as well as when the User interacted with it, such as by clicking on links included in the message.
Amazon Simple Email Service (Amazon)
Amazon Simple Email Service is an email address management and message sending service provided by Amazon.com Inc. Personal Data processed: email address.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: identiﬁers.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
Twilio (Twilio, Inc.)
Twilio is a phone numbers management and communication service provided by Twilio, Inc.
Personal Data processed: phone number.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: identiﬁers.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
Platform Services and Hosting
These services have the purpose of hosting and running key components of This Platform, therefore allowing the provision of This Platform from within a uniﬁed platform. Such platforms provide a wide range of tools to the Owner – e.g. analytics, user registration, commenting, database management, e- commerce, payment processing – that imply the collection and handling of Personal Data.
Some of these services work through geographically distributed servers, making it difﬁcult to determine the actual location where the Personal Data are stored.
Apple App Store (Apple Inc.)
This Platform is distributed on Apple's App Store, a platform for the distribution of mobile apps, provided by Apple Inc.
By virtue of being distributed via this app store, Apple collects basic analytics and provides reporting features that enables the Owner to view usage analytics data and measure the performance of This Platform. Much of this information is processed on an opt-in basis.
Users may opt-out of this analytics feature directly through their device settings. More information on how to manage analysis settings can be found on
this page
.
Personal Data processed: Usage Data.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
Google Play Store (Google LLC)
This Platform is distributed on the Google Play Store, a platform for the distribution of mobile apps, provided by Google LLC.
By virtue of being distributed via this app store, Google collects usage and diagnostics data and share aggregate information with the Owner. Much of this information is processed on an opt-in basis. Users may opt-out of this analytics feature directly through their device settings. More information on how to manage analysis settings can be found on
this page
.
Personal Data processed: Usage Data.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
SPAM protection
This type of service analyses the trafﬁc of This Platform, potentially containing Users' Personal Data, with the purpose of ﬁltering it from parts of trafﬁc, messages and content that are recognised as SPAM.
Google reCAPTCHA (Google LLC)
Google reCAPTCHA is a SPAM protection service provided by Google LLC. The use of reCAPTCHA is subject to the Google
privacy policy
and
terms of use
.
Personal Data processed: Cookies; Usage Data.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
Tag Management
This type of service helps the Owner to manage the tags or scripts needed on This Platform in a centralised fashion. This results in the Users' Data ﬂowing through these services, potentially resulting in the retention of this Data.
Tealium IQ tag Management (Tealium Inc.)
Tealium IQ tag Management is a tag management service provided by Tealium Inc. Personal Data processed: Cookies; Usage Data.
Place of processing: United States –
Privacy Policy
. Privacy Shield participant.
Category of personal data collected according to CCPA: internet information.
This processing constitutes a sale based on the deﬁnition under the CCPA. In addition to the information in this clause, the User can ﬁnd information regarding how to opt out of the sale in the section detailing the rights of Californian consumers.
User database management
This type of service allows the Owner to build user proﬁles by starting from an email address, a personal name, or other information that the User provides to This Platform, as well as to track User activities through analytics features. This Personal Data may also be matched with publicly available information about the User (such as social networks' proﬁles) and used to build private proﬁles that the Owner can display and use for improving This Platform.
Some of these services may also enable the sending of timed messages to the User, such as emails based on speciﬁc actions performed on This Platform.
Microsoft Cloud Services
Personal Data: address; country; email address; ﬁrst name; last name; phone number-
Privacy Policy
Further Information About Personal Data
Push Notiﬁcations
This Platform may send push notiﬁcations to the User to achieve the purposes outlined in this privacy policy.
Users may in most cases opt-out of receiving push notiﬁcations by visiting their device settings, such as the notiﬁcation settings for mobile phones, and then change those settings for This Platform, some or all of the apps on the particular device.
Users must be aware that disabling push notiﬁcations may negatively affect the utility of This Platform.
Selling goods and services online
The Personal Data collected are used to provide the User with services or to sell goods, including payment.
The Personal Data collected to complete the payment may include the credit card, the bank account used for the transfer, or any other means of payment envisaged. The kind of Data collected by This Platform depends on the payment system used.
The Rights of Users
Users may exercise certain rights regarding their Data processed by the Owner. In particular, Users have the right to do the following:
Withdraw their consent at any time. Users have the right to withdraw consent where they have previously given their consent to the processing of their Personal Data.
Object to processing of their Data. Users have the right to object to the processing of their Data if the processing is carried out on a legal basis other than consent. Further details are provided in the dedicated section below.
Access their Data. Users have the right to learn if Data is being processed by the Owner, obtain disclosure regarding certain aspects of the processing, and obtain a copy of the Data undergoing processing.
Verify and seek rectiﬁcation. Users have the right to verify the accuracy of their Data and ask for it to be updated or corrected.
Restrict the processing of their Data. Users have the right, under certain circumstances, to restrict the processing of their Data. In this case, the Owner will not process their Data for any purpose other than storing it.
Have their Personal Data deleted or otherwise removed. Users have the right, under certain circumstances, to obtain the erasure of their Data from the Owner.
Receive their Data and have it transferred to another controller. Users have the right to receive their Data in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and, if technically feasible, to have it transmitted to another controller without any hindrance. This provision is applicable provided that the Data is processed by automated means and that the processing is based on the User's consent, on a contract which the User is part of or on pre-contractual obligations thereof.
Lodge a complaint. Users have the right to bring a claim before their competent data protection authority.
Details About the Right to Object to Processing
Where Personal Data is processed for a public interest, in the exercise of an ofﬁcial authority vested in the Owner or for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by the Owner, Users may object to such processing by providing a ground related to their particular situation to justify the objection.
Users must know that, however, should their Personal Data be processed for direct marketing purposes, they can object to that processing at any time without providing any justiﬁcation. To learn, whether the Owner is processing Personal Data for direct marketing purposes, Users may refer to the relevant sections of this document.
How to Exercise These Rights
Any requests to exercise User rights can be directed to the Owner through the contact details provided in this document. These requests can be exercised free of charge and will be addressed by the Owner as early as possible and always within one month.
Cookie Policy
This Platform uses Cookies and other Identiﬁers. To learn more, the User may consult the Cookies Policy.
Additional Information about Data Collection and Processing
Legal action
The User's Personal Data may be used for legal purposes by the Owner in Court or in the stages leading to possible legal action arising from improper use of This Platform or the related Services.
The User declares to be aware that the Owner may be required to reveal personal data upon request of public authorities.
Additional Information about User's Personal Data
In addition to the information contained in this privacy policy, This Platform may provide the User with additional and contextual information concerning particular Services or the collection and processing of Personal Data upon request.
System Logs and Maintenance
For operation and maintenance purposes, This Platform and any third-party services may collect ﬁles that record interaction with This Platform (System logs) use other Personal Data (such as the IP Address) for this purpose.
Information Not Contained in this Privacy Policy
More details concerning the collection or processing of Personal Data may be requested from the Owner at any time. Please see the contact information at the beginning of this document.
How "Do Not Track" Requests are Handled
This Platform does not support "Do Not Track" requests.
To determine whether any of the third-party services it uses honour the "Do Not Track" requests, please read their privacy policies.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
The Owner reserves the right to make changes to this privacy policy at any time by notifying its Users on this page and possibly within This Platform and/or - as far as technically and legally feasible - sending a notice to Users via any contact information available to the Owner. It is strongly recommended to check this page often, referring to the date of the last modiﬁcation listed at the bottom.
Should the changes affect processing activities performed on the basis of the User's consent, the Owner shall collect new consent from the User, where required.
Information for Californian Consumers
This part of the document integrates with and supplements the information contained in the rest of the privacy policy and is provided by the business running This Platform and, if the case may be, its parent, subsidiaries and afﬁliates (for the purposes of this section referred to collectively as "
we
", "
us
", "
our
").
The provisions contained in this section apply to all Users who are consumers residing in the state of California, United States of America, according to "The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018" (Users are referred to below, simply as "
you
", "
your
", "
yours
"), and, for such consumers, these provisions supersede any other possibly divergent or conﬂicting provisions contained in the privacy policy.
This part of the document uses the term "personal information" as it is deﬁned in The California Consumer Privacy Act ("
CCPA
").
Categories of Personal Information Collected, Disclosed or Sold
In this section we summarise the categories of personal information that we have collected, disclosed, or sold and the purposes thereof.
You can read about these activities in detail in the section titled "Detailed information on the processing of Personal Data" within this document.
Information we collect: the categories of personal information we collect
We have collected the following categories of personal information about you: identiﬁers, internet information and geolocation data. We will not collect additional categories of personal information without notifying you.
How we collect information: what are the sources of the personal information we collect?
We collect the above-mentioned categories of personal information, either directly or indirectly, from you when you use This Platform.
For example, you directly provide your personal information when you submit requests via any forms on This Platform. You also provide personal information indirectly when you navigate This Platform, as personal information about you is automatically observed and collected. Finally, we may collect your personal information from third parties that work with us in connection with the Service or with the functioning of This Platform and features thereof.
How we use the information we collect: sharing and disclosing of your personal information with third parties for a business purpose
We may disclose the personal information we collect about you to a third party for business purposes. In this case, we enter a written agreement with such third party that requires the recipient to both keep the personal information conﬁdential and not use it for any purpose(s) other than those necessary for the performance of the agreement.
We may also disclose your personal information to third parties when you explicitly ask or authorise us to do so, in order to provide you with our Service. To ﬁnd out more about the purposes of processing, please refer to the relevant section of this document.
Sale of your personal information
For our purposes, the word "sale" means any "selling, renting, releasing, disclosing, disseminating, making available, transferring or otherwise communicating orally, in writing, or by electronic means, a consumer's personal information by the business to
another business or a third party, for monetary or other valuable consideration
".
This means that, for example, a sale can happen whenever an application runs ads, or makes statistical analyses on the trafﬁc or views, or simply because it uses tools such as social network plugins and the like.
Your right to opt out of the sale of personal information
You have the right to opt out of the sale of your personal information. This means that whenever you request us to stop selling your data, we will abide by your request.
Such requests can be made freely, at any time, without submitting any veriﬁable request, simply by following the instructions below.
Instructions to opt out of the sale of personal information
If you'd like to know more, or exercise your right to opt out in regard to all the sales carried out by This Platform, both online and ofﬂine, you can contact us for further information using the contact details provided in this document.
What are the purposes for which we use your personal information?
We may use your personal information to allow the operational functioning of This Platform and features thereof ("business purposes"). In such cases, your personal information will be processed in a fashion necessary and proportionate to the business purpose for which it was collected, and strictly within the limits of compatible operational purposes.
We may also use your personal information for other reasons such as for commercial purposes (as indicated within the section "Detailed information on the processing of Personal Data" within this document), as well as for complying with the law and defending our rights before the competent authorities where our rights and interests are threatened or we suffer an actual damage.
We will not use your personal information for different, unrelated, or incompatible purposes without notifying you.
Your California Privacy Rights and How To Exercise Them
The right to know and to portability
You have the right to request that we disclose to you:
the categories and sources of the personal information that we collect about you, the purposes for which we use your information and with whom such information is shared;
in case of sale of personal information or disclosure for a business purpose, two separate lists where we disclose:
for sales, the personal information categories purchased by each category of recipient; and
for disclosures for a business purpose, the personal information categories obtained by each category of recipient.
The disclosure described above will be limited to the personal information collected or used over the past 12 months.
If we deliver our response electronically, the information enclosed will be "portable", i.e. delivered in an easily usable format to enable you to transmit the information to another entity without hindrance – provided that this is technically feasible.
The right to request the deletion of your personal information
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information, subject to exceptions set forth by the law (such as, including but not limited to, where the information is used to identify and repair errors on This Platform, to detect security incidents and protect against fraudulent or illegal activities, to exercise certain rights etc.).
If no legal exception applies, as a result of exercising your right, we will delete your personal information and direct any of our service providers to do so.
How to exercise your rights
To exercise the rights described above, you need to submit your veriﬁable request to us by contacting us via the details provided in this document.
For us to respond to your request, it is necessary that we know who you are. Therefore, you can only exercise the above rights by making a veriﬁable request which must:
provide sufﬁcient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorised representative;
describe your request with sufﬁcient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
We will not respond to any request if we are unable to verify your identity and therefore conﬁrm the personal information in our possession actually relates to you.
If you cannot personally submit a veriﬁable request, you can authorise a person registered with the California Secretary of State to act on your behalf. If you are an adult, you can make a veriﬁable request on behalf of a minor under your parental authority.
You can submit a maximum number of 2 requests over a period of 12 months.
How and when we are expected to handle your request
We will conﬁrm receipt of your veriﬁable request within 10 days and provide information about how we will process your request.
We will respond to your request within 45 days of its receipt. Should we need more time, we will explain to you the reasons why, and how much more time we need. In this regard, please note that we may take up to 90 days to fulﬁl your request.
Our disclosure(s) will cover the preceding 12-month period.
Should we deny your request, we will explain you the reasons behind our denial.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your veriﬁable request unless such request is manifestly unfounded or excessive. In such cases, we may charge a reasonable fee, or refuse to act on the request. In either case, we will communicate our choices and explain the reasons behind it.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://www.network.ae/en/contents/view/privacy-notice:
Privacy
Notice
Introduction
This Privacy Notice sets out the basis on which any Personal Information
                            Network collects, uses, shares and otherwise processes. Please read the following carefully
                            to understand Network’s views and practices regarding Personal Information and how Network
                            will treat it. By accessing and using Network Services, including Network’s interactions
                            with you via our websites (including but not limited to www.network.ae), mobile sites and
                            applications (“Sites”), you agree to the transfer, storing and processing of Personal
                            Information as set out in this Privacy Notice.
Definitions
“Card” When Network uses the word ‘card’ in this notice, it applies to all
                            payment methods and types and not simply those involving a physical card; and use of the
                            term ‘cardholder’ applies to any shopper or individual whose payment transactions may be
                            processed.
“Network” means Network International Holdings Plc., Network International LLC any of its
                            subsidiaries or affiliates.
“Network Services” means the products and services which are being offered by Network.
"Personal Information or Personal Data" for purposes of this Policy means to any information
                            relating to an identified or identifiable individual.
You are important
At Network our most important asset is you and your trust. In this Privacy
                            Policy we will cover what and how we collect, use, disclose, transfer, and store your
                            information.
We want to assure you that Network is committed to maintaining the confidentiality,
                            integrity and security of any Personal Information about our users. This Privacy Policy will
                            explain to you what and how we collect, use, disclose, transfer, and store your non-personal
                            and Personal Information shared through our Sites or in connection with our Services.
It is not mandatory for you to provide the Personal Information that we have requested, but,
                            if you choose not to do so, unfortunately, we will not be able to provide you with our
                            Services or respond to any queries you may have.
Principles of Data Processing
Network shall apply the following principles when processing your Personal
                            Information:
1. Lawfulness, fairness and transparency: All Personal Information will processed fairly,
                            transparently and in compliance with applicable laws.
2. Purpose: Any Personal Information collected will be used for a stated purpose.
3. Data Minimization: Network will collect only the Personal Information that is adequate
                            and relevant to the purposes for which it is collected.
4. Accuracy: Network will keep the Personal Information accurate and, where necessary, kept
                            up to date information.
5. Storage Limitation: Personal Information will be stored with Network for a defined period
                            as per its policy or applicable law.
6. Integrity and Confidentiality: Network will implement appropriate technical,
                            organizational and physical security measures to protect Personal Information.
7. Accountability: Network will maintain applicable records, logs when dealing with Personal
                            Information.
What kind of Personal Information do we collect?
Network collects Personal Information relating to cardholders, merchants or
                            other customers, suppliers and other business partners in order to carry out its business
                            activities. Network may collect Personal Information from various sources, including:
Information you voluntarily provide, either directly or via our customers;
Information automatically collected when you use our Sites and Services, including in
                                our role as a payment processor;
Information collected by cookies and other tracking technologies when you use our Sites;
This Personal Information may include:
Contact information, Demographic information, Identification information, Payment
                            transaction information, Financial and credit card information, Technical information,
                            Social media posts, Applications (including job applications)
Non-Personal Information.
We also collect information in a form that does not, on its own, permit direct association
                            with any specific individual such as occupation, language, zip/area code, location, time
                            zone, etc. We may collect, use, transfer, and disclose non-personal information for any
                            purpose. This information is aggregated and used to help us provide more useful information
                            to our customers and to understand which portions of Services are of most interest. This
                            aggregated data is considered non personal information for the purposes of this Privacy
                            Notice.
How do we use your Personal Information?
Network uses Personal Information internally in relation to:
1. Conduct its Operations, Risk Management, Transaction Processing, Marketing, development
                            of existing and new Products and for Legal, compliance, regulatory or law enforcement
                            purposes.
2. Online Session Information and Use is Collected to Improve Your Experience
We may also collect technical and navigational related Personal Information, such as computer
                            browser type, Internet protocol address, pages visited, and average time spent on our Site.
                            This Personal Information may be used, for example, to alert you to software compatibility
                            issues, or it may be analyzed to improve our design and functionality of the Network Sites
                            and the Services.
We Use Cookies and other technologies to improve your Experience
We may use cookies and similar technologies to help us better understand user behavior, tell
                            us which parts of Network Sites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the
                            effectiveness of offer and Services and improve them.
We treat the information received from cookies and other technologies as non-personal
                            information.
You will have the option to disable cookies. If you choose to do so, unfortunately, certain
                            features of the Network website and the Services will not be available once cookies are
                            disabled.
Some web browsers may send out ‘do not track’ signals. There is no industry standard
                            currently in place as to what websites and other online services should do upon receipt of
                            such signals. Should such a standard be developed, Network will re-visit its notice, but
                            currently takes no action upon receipt of such signals.
Network may offer certain features that are only available through the use of tracking
                            technologies. Temporary cookies are used to enable you to navigate our site and use its
                            features. These are deleted when you close your browser. IP addresses are used in
                            conjunction with cookies for the purpose of “remembering” computers or other devices used to
                            access our Sites.
Analytical or performance cookies collect anonymous information about how visitors use our
                            websites. They allow us to analyse information such as the count of visitors to our
                            websites, what search terms our visitors are using, what pages are viewed, and the last page
                            visited. This information is based on the visitor’s IP address, and we cannot view
                            individual activity tied to a single person.
To the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses (or similar identifiers) are clearly
                            defined to be Personal Information under any local law and where such local law is
                            applicable to Network Services, Network will manage such identifiers as Personal
                            Information.
Network Sites may also contain links to and from third party websites, including those of
                            partner networks, advertisers and affiliates. Please note that these websites may have their
                            own privacy notices and cookies policies, and Network does not accept any responsibility or
                            liability for these third party websites. The inclusion of links to third party websites in
                            no way constitutes an endorsement by us of such websites’ content, actions, or policies.
How We Use Anonymized Data: Peer Comparisons, Research & Development
Network may make anonymous or aggregate Personal Information and disclose such data only in a
                            non-personally identifiable manner to:
(i) advertising, measurement or analytics partners approved by Network that conduct research
                            into consumer spending;
(ii) deliver products and services to other clients; and
(iii) Users of the Service for purposes of comparison of their financial situation relative
                            to the broader community.
With whom does Network share Personal Information and for what purposes?
Before we share Personal Information, we ensure there are adequate safeguards in place to
                            protect the processing of that data. Network does not disclose information that could
                            identify you personally to anyone, except as described in this notice, including, but not
                            limited to:
Any Network group company;
Any group company (such as advisers, share plan, payroll and other third party
                                administrators, agents or contractors working on behalf of Network);
Financial institution clients;
Service providers and other third parties under contract who help with our business
                                operations (including, but not limited to, fraud investigations, site analytics and
                                operations);
Regulatory, legal and judicial authorities;
Social media sites integrated into web services that we offer;
Governmental or quasi-governmental organizations; and
Potential purchasers of Network.
Network may disclose Personal Information to third parties for the following purposes:
Legal or regulatory purposes
Business purposes
Suppliers who assist Network with the provision of its Services
Information on cross-border data transfers
Network International Holdings Plc., has its headquarters in London, United Kingdom. Network
                            International LLC, a subsidiary of Network International Holdings Plc., has it registered
                            office in Dubai, UAE. Network has offices and operations in other countries including Egypt,
                            South Africa, Jordan, Saudi Arabia, and Nigeria. The data Network collects from you may be
                            transferred, stored and processed in a country different from where the data was
                            collected.
By using our Network Sites and Services, you are permitting Network (or its authorized
                            service providers) to process, store and transfer Personal Information to a country which is
                            different from where the data was collected. The transfer of information will often be in
                            furtherance of a contract to which you or your bank/merchant are a party. In other cases,
                            the transfer of information will be consistent with the legitimate interests of conducting
                            Network Services.
Individual’s Privacy Rights (data subject rights)
Certain laws and regulations give individual data subject rights in relation to their
                            Personal Information (for example, the right to access that data, to rectify inaccurate
                            data, or to erase Personal Information). In certain circumstances, data subjects may have
                            such rights in respect of the Personal Information processed by Network. In such
                            circumstances, where a request to exercise such a right is received by Network, it must be
                            forwarded to
privacy@network.global
so that it can be
                            handled in accordance with applicable laws and statutory timeframes.
How do we keep your Personal Information safe and secure?
We are bound by our Group Policies
Our employees are committed to maintain the highest data protection standards by complying
                            with this Privacy Notice and our other policies including our Code of Conduct and Group Data
                            Protection Policy. The Board Audit and Technology Committee has the overall responsibility
                            to review the adequacy and effectiveness of the Group Data Protection Policy, ensure
                            compliance with the same, and review and approve changes to the said Policy wherever
                            considered appropriate.
All our employees receive trainings on these important requirements at least annually.
We Are Committed To Keeping Your Personal Information Secure
The security of your Personal Information is important to us. As discussed below, we utilize
                            physical, electronic and procedural security measures to protect against loss, misuse, and
                            alteration of Personal Information under our control. We adhere to industry standard
                            practices and security measures and our practices are independently validated annually
                            enabling us to comply with ISO 27001 and PCI-DSS standards to safeguard and secure the
                            information we collect.
No method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage, is completely
                            secure. Therefore, we cannot guarantee its absolute security. Any transmission is at your
                            own risk.
We use a combination of firewall barriers, encryption techniques and authentication
                            procedures, among others, to maintain the security of your online in-app session and to
                            protect Network accounts and systems from unauthorized access. Our servers are in a secure
                            facility. Access requires multiple levels of authentication. Security personnel monitor the
                            system 7 days a week, 24 hours a day.
We Enforce Physical Access Controls to Our Facilities
No employee may put any Personal Information or account Personal Information on any insecure
                            machine (i.e., nothing can be taken from the database and put on an insecure laptop). In
                            addition, Network frequently tests the Service for any failure points that would allow
                            hacking.
However, it is important to understand that these precautions apply only to our Service and
                            systems. We exercise no control over how your Personal Information is stored, maintained or
                            displayed by third parties or on third-party sites.
Our Service Ensures Secure Communications with Encryption
From the time you submit your login ID and password so that communications between your
                            device and Network are encrypted. This enables client and server applications to communicate
                            in a way that is designed to prevent eavesdropping, tampering and message forgery.
You are responsible for keeping your login ID, password, mobile device, and email account
                            safe and confidential.
You also agree that you control and limit access to the email account and mobile device. If
                            your email address or your mobile device changes, you are responsible for informing us of
                            that change.
We are not responsible if someone else accesses your account through Registration
                            Information they have obtained from you or through a violation by you of this Privacy Notice
                            or the Terms of Use.
Restrictions and Monitoring of Our Partners and third parties
Any partners we work with have been selected in accordance with our security and risk
                            management policies and practices and are bound by contractual obligations which includes
                            compliance with Network policies and requirements relating to confidentiality, privacy and
                            security. They may be subject to discipline, including termination and criminal prosecution,
                            if they fail to meet these obligations.
We may also use third party vendors or service providers to help us provide the Service to
                            you, such as sending e-mail messages on our behalf or hosting and operating a particular
                            feature or functionality of the Service. We require such third parties to maintain the
                            confidentiality of the Personal Information we provide to them.
How long does Network store and retain Personal Information?
Network will store Personal Information only for the greater of as long as necessary to
                            achieve the purposes for which it was collected and applicable law. Retention periods for
                            transaction and other data categories may vary, depending on our obligations. For example,
                            legal and regulatory compliance with anti-money laundering (AML) and KYC requirements,
                            operational demands, business requirements or dates we assigned based on contracts will also
                            need to be taken into account, and may require retention for a period of up to 7 years after
                            the data was collected or after the merchant or other customer relationship has ended.
What happens in case of a data breach?
In case Network is faced with a breach of Personal Information, Network shall inform the
                            relevant authorities and the data subjects where required by applicable law and shall take
                            necessary steps to mitigate the impact of such breach.
Changes and updates to the privacy notice
Network may, from time to time, make changes to this Privacy Notice. If any material changes
                            are made as to how Network treat Personal Information, you will be notified through this
                            notice on Network’s Sites.
The date the Privacy Notice was last modified is at the bottom of the page. You are
                            responsible for ensuring you periodically visit our Sites to check for any changes. By
                            continuing to use Network Services or the Sites, you agree to the changes in this Privacy
                            Notice.
This notice is global in scope, but is not intended to override any legal rights in any
                            territory where such rights prevail. In such event, the rights and obligations set out in
                            this Privacy Policy will apply, subject only to amendment under any applicable local law
                            having precedence.
Questions
We have appointed Amit Khandelwal as the Group Data Protection Officer (DPO). If you have questions, comments, concerns or feedback regarding this Privacy Notice or any other privacy concern, contact DPO at
privacy@network.global
or call us at
+971 4075863
.
Last modified: 25 September 2024
Sub-policy 2
https://www.bankfab.com/en-ae/privacy-policy:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Skip to content
How can we help you?
Search
Search
'' did not bring up any results.
Search
Popular searches
Activate a FAB card
Contact Center
Credit Cards
In-Branch Digital Services
Mobile Banking
First Abu Dhabi Bank
PJSC
(“
FAB
” or “
we
”) are committed to providing the highest level of protection regarding the processing of their customers’ personal data based on applicable data protection laws and regulations.
This policy describes how FAB’s head office in the United Arab Emirates (UAE) and its UAE branches may collect, use, store, disclose or otherwise process your personal data, including in the context of your application for, or use of, one or more of our products or services, or when you use the UAE version of our website (“
Website
”). It applies to you whenever you use the Website including if you are an individual client or a representative of a corporate client (including former, current and prospective clients).
Personal data comprises all the information that FAB collects and processes about you that can identify you directly or indirectly, including information received from third parties and information collected through use of the Website, cookies or other similar technology and our electronic banking services.
More specifically, the personal data FAB collects or processes about you may include:
Identifying information
including your name, date of birth, place of birth, nationality, country of residence, country of tax domicile, passport number, residency permit details, tax identification details, passport details, and photo;
OR
Our interactions with you
including any records of phone calls between you and FAB, and logs of related information including your phone number, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types of calls;
OR
Identifiers FAB assigns to you
such as your client, business relation, partner, or account number;
OR
Contact information
including postal address, telephone number, email address and mobile number;
OR
Family information
including marital status and details of any dependants;
OR
Financial information
including information about your financial circumstances and source of wealth, details of personal assets, bank account numbers, spending, income and credit bureau reports from relevant authorities;
OR
Professional information
including details of your employer, your education and career history, and business interests; and
OR
Website technical data
including your IP address used to access the Website, website login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform and other technology on the devices you use to access the Website.
OR
If you have any questions or complaints regarding this privacy policy or the protection of your personal data, please contact FAB’s data protection team at the following:
FAB Data Protection Team
First Abu Dhabi Bank
Abu Dhabi, United Arab Emirates
Email:
privacy@bankfab.com
For more information about our use of cookies please refer to our Cookie Policy.
View our Cookie Policy
PDF
Processing Personal Data
FAB may process your personal data for the following purposes:
Processing application forms for products and services, including assessing customer suitability and performing necessary checks and risk assessments (e.g. in case of credit request)
Providing products and services (including electronic banking services), including effecting payments, transactions and completing instructions or requests
Monitoring and improving the Website and its content
Establishing and managing banking relationships and accounts
Conducting market research and surveys with the aim of improving our products and services
Marketing and promotion, conducted with or without the support of third parties engaged by the Bank
Remaining competitive as well as developing and improving our products and services
Preventing, detecting, investigating and prosecuting crimes (including but not limited to money laundering, terrorism, fraud and other financial crimes) in any jurisdiction, identity verification, government sanctions screening and due diligence checks
Complying with applicable local or foreign law, regulation, policy, voluntary codes, directive, judgement or court order, as well as any request by any authority, regulator or enforcement agency or body in respect of any member of the FAB group
Establishing, exercising or defending legal rights in connection with legal proceedings (including any prospective legal proceedings) and seeking professional or legal advice in relation to such legal proceedings
Surveillance of premises and
ATM
s
FAB processes your personal data for the performance of the banking contract(s) concluded with you as an individual client, compliance with applicable legal or regulatory obligations or FAB legitimate interests to provide you with adequate and qualitative products and services and to prevent against any excessive risk.
FAB processes your personal data for the performance of the banking contract(s) concluded with you as an individual client or a representative of a corporate client, compliance with applicable legal or regulatory obligations or to provide you with adequate and qualitative products and services and to prevent against any excessive risk.
FAB processes your personal data based on your consent. Personal data requested by FAB is usually necessary for the provision of a service or product to you or for your use of the Website. If your personal data is not provided, FAB may be unable to comply with its legal or regulatory obligations or to provide you with the requested products and services. When providing your data is necessary for the provision of a service or product, FAB will inform you of that and the consequences of failing to provide it.
You have the right to withdraw your consent to the use of your personal data at any time through the methods communicated by FAB through its various communication channels from time to time. Your withdrawal of consent will come into effect within 30 days from the receipt of the withdrawal request, but will not affect the lawfulness of any personal data processing that occurred prior to such withdrawal coming into effect (for example, if a credit check is run at the start of your contract) or any subsequent processing related to FAB’s business operations.
Your personal data processed by FAB will be kept confidential and will only be accessed on a need-to-know basis or where required by law, regulation or court orders by our employees involved in the provision of the products and services concerned, and third parties such as service providers involved in the provision of our products and services, other financial institutions, financial intermediaries, regulatory and governmental authorities and our professional advisors. FAB notifies you from time to time which third parties may access your personal data, including in information given to you in the context of forms you complete when you apply for our products or services. For more information, please also see clause 30 of FAB's
General Terms and Conditions
for Accounts.
This privacy policy does not apply to third-party websites where our online advertisements are displayed, nor to linked third-party websites which we do not operate or control.
Your personal data processed by FAB are retained by FAB in a form which permits your identification for a minimum of 5 years from the end of our business relationship (or closing of your account) or completion of the relevant transaction (if we have no business relationship with you) but no longer than is necessary for the purposes for which the personal data are processed in line with legal, regulatory or statutory obligations.
At the expiry of such periods, your personal data will be deleted or securely archived to comply with legal retention obligations or in accordance with applicable statutory limitation periods.
To the extent permitted by law, we may record and monitor your communications with us to ensure compliance with our legal and regulatory obligations and our internal policies. This may include the recording of telephone conversations.
Subject to applicable law, regulations and/or banking industry guidelines, you may be entitled to invoke a data subject’s right in relation to your personal data being processed by FAB.
The rights that you can invoke as a data subject may include:
Right of Access
You have the right to obtain from us confirmation as to whether or not personal data concerning you is being processed, and, where that is the case, ask us for copies of your personal information. For any further copies requested, please note that we may charge a reasonable fee based on administrative costs.
Right to Rectification
You have the right to obtain from FAB without undue delay the rectification of inaccurate personal data concerning you.
Right to Request Erasure
Subject to compliance with the applicable mandatory retention periods, you have the right to request from FAB the erasure of personal data concerning you where (a) the personal data is no longer necessary for FAB’s business operations (including offering you the financial services or products) or (b) you withdraw your consent to the processing of your personal data and there is no other ground for the processing.
Right to Restriction of Processing
You have the right to obtain from FAB restriction of processing where one of the following applies:
you contest the accuracy of your personal data (in such a case, the restriction will be for a period enabling FAB to verify the accuracy of said data) or the processing is unlawful;
FAB no longer needs the personal data for the purposes of the processing, but they are required by the data subject for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims;
you object to processing pending the verification whether FAB’s legitimate grounds override those of the data subject.
Right to Transfer Data
You have the right to the transfer of your personal data to another financial institution or financial service provider, upon your request and where the processing is based on your consent.
Right to Object to the Processing
You have the right to object, on grounds relating to your particular situation, at any time to processing of personal data concerning you. FAB shall no longer process said personal data except where such personal data is required for business operations related to the products or services offered to you.
Any future withdrawal of consent will not affect the lawfulness of personal data processing prior to such withdrawal (for example, if a credit check is run at the start of your contract) or any subsequent processing related to FAB’s business operations.
Such right can be exercised at any time where your personal data is processed for direct marketing purposes.
To invoke your data subject rights, please send an email to FAB’s data protection officer (see contact details above).
The security and confidentiality of your personal data is important to us and FAB has invested significant resources to protect the safekeeping and confidentiality of your personal data. When using external service providers acting as processors, we require that they adhere to the same standards as FAB. Regardless of where your personal information is transferred or stored, we take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that personal data is kept secure.
FAB operates channels, pages and accounts on some social media sites to inform, assist and engage with customers. FAB monitors and records comments and posts made on these channels about FAB in order to improve its products and services.
Please note that you must not communicate to FAB through such social media sites the following types of information:
confidential personal data, including any information regarding your financial situation, bank account details, transactions, etc.;
sensitive personal data including (i) special categories of personal data meaning any information revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership, and the processing of genetic data, biometric data for the purpose of uniquely identifying a natural person, data concerning health or data concerning a natural person's sex life or sexual orientation and (ii) other sensitive personal data such as criminal convictions and offences and national identification number;
excessive, inappropriate, offensive or insulting information towards individuals.
FAB is not responsible for any information posted on those sites other than the information posted by its employees on its behalf. FAB is only responsible for its own use of the personal data received through such sites.
FAB may in its absolute discretion update this policy from time to time in accordance with clause 38 of the General Terms and Conditions for Accounts.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.refinitiv.com/en/products/world-check-kyc-screening/privacy-statement:
LSEG Risk Intelligence
Screening solutions
World-Check - KYC Screening
About World-Check
World-Check Privacy Statement
World-Check Privacy Statement
Who we are
What this privacy statement covers
Who World-Check holds information about
What personal information we process
How we use information about you
What legal grounds do we use to process your information
Who we disclose your personal information to
How we secure your personal information
Why information may be transferred abroad
How long we keep your information
Your rights
California privacy rights
How to contact us
Changes to this privacy statement
Your questions answered
(LAST UPDATED: FEBRUARY 07, 2025)
This privacy statement explains how Refinitiv Limited (
“Refinitiv”, “we”, “us”
or
“our”
) collects, handles, discloses, stores and protects information about you in the context of the World-Check service (“
World-Check
”).
It also explains who we are,
your rights
that may be available to you depending on applicable law, and how you can
contact us
if you have questions about how we handle your information.
You can also access more information on how World-Check works by clicking here.
Refinitiv Limited, registered in the United Kingdom, is a member of the London Stock Exchange Group of companies (“
LSEG Group
”) and the entity responsible as controller for processing personal information within World-Check.
This privacy statement only covers World-Check. For our general LSEG Privacy Statement, applicable to information the LSEG Group collects from and about users in connection with its products, services, websites, platforms, software, applications and events,
please click here
.
We hold information within World-Check that helps financial institutions, corporates, professional services firms, governments, law enforcement agencies, regulators and other World-Check customers and companies within the LSEG Group (“World-Check Users”) to perform due diligence and other screening activities in accordance with their legal or regulatory obligations and risk management procedures carried out in the public interest, including but not limited to the purposes of anti-money-laundering or ‘know your customer’, anti-bribery or anti-corruption or other regulatory compliance checks, or for preventing, investigating, detecting or prosecuting financial crime, fraud and serious misconduct or dishonesty, or other criminal or unlawful activity (for example, modern slavery, illegal trafficking, environmental crime, etc.) and any unethical conduct (“Checks”).
It is designed and maintained to improve the speed, accuracy and transparency of Checks which are carried out by World-Check Users on customers, vendors, business partners and other counterparties.
World-Check is not aimed at children. In the limited circumstances where we collect and use personal information about children (for example, because they are the children of a PEP (as defined below), we comply with industry guidelines and applicable laws.
Your information is only included on World-Check if
Public Domain Data
(as defined below) suggests that there is information about you that World-Check Users ought to be aware of for the purposes of Checks.
When World-Check Users carry out Checks, they can also choose to carry out searches of
Public Domain Data
contained within media sources using media search tools available in World-Check. For example, they may conduct media searches against names of their customers, vendors, business partners, or other counterparties. For more information on this,
click here.
The inclusion of information about you on World-Check does not prevent you from doing business with World-Check Users such as financial institutions
.
You can find out if information about you is on World-Check
here.
To see our FAQs on how World-Check works,
click here.
Your information is typically included on World-Check if
Public Domain Data
indicates that:
you are a “politically exposed person” (“PEP”) as defined by the FATF Recommendations or fall into a similar category of persons (for example, you are a senior diplomat, member of the judiciary, religious leader, military figure or trade unionist) under national laws or regulations against money-laundering, terrorist financing, bribery or corruption. The FATF Recommendations are global standards against money laundering and terrorist financing issued by the Financial Action Task Force (“FATF”), an inter-governmental body originally established by the G7 in 1989 and now with approximately 40 members;
you are a close associate of a PEP, again as defined in the FATF Recommendations. Close associates may include children (for example, the children of a PEP and other minor dependents of a PEP). Where we do collect information about children we will comply with applicable laws and industry guidelines.
you are listed on the website of a regulator, law enforcement authority or governmental body in connection with money-laundering, terrorist financing, bribery, corruption or similar activities;
you are included on a government or international body’s sanctions list (such as the sanctions lists issued by the European Union);
you are linked to terrorist or financial crime-related activities;
you have been accused, investigated, arrested, charged, or convicted of crimes which are a possible pre-cursor to money laundering or terrorist financing (e.g. arms trafficking, smuggling, fraud, membership of an organised crime group, environmental offences, war crimes), which are also known as a predicate offence, or you are suspected of involvement in these activities; or
you have been disqualified or are prohibited from holding positions of responsibility (such as company directorships).
Inclusion of information about you in World-Check does not suggest that you are involved in, or linked to, financial crime, terrorism or any other criminality or unlawful act or unethical conduct. For example, being identified as a PEP simply tells a World-Check User that you perform, or performed, a prominent political or related function or are connected to someone who holds or held such a position.
World-Check Users make their own decisions about how to use the World-Check data they receive in order to conduct their Checks. If you have any questions about these decisions, please refer them to the relevant World-Check User. For further information on how World-Check works,
click here.
For the purpose of this privacy statement, "
Public Domain Data
” means personal information (1) originally available to the public and typically over the internet; (2) that Refinitiv has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public by or from: (i) the data subject (or consumer or individual to whom the personal information relates), (ii) widely distributed media, or (iii) from a person to whom the data subject has disclosed the personal information (provided that Refinitiv does not have knowledge that the data subject has restricted the information to a specific audience); or (3) lawfully made available from records, databases, and/or systems of government agencies, departments, divisions or other operating units, in electronic, paper or any other format. Examples include personal information found on: (i) sanction or watch lists; (ii) law enforcement, court, regulatory or other government websites; (iii) political websites and publications such as parliamentary, local government or individual politician websites; (iv) reputable news media and publications; and (v) information sources made public by an individual themselves, for example on their website, blog or any social media application.
Back to top ↑
As part of World-Check, we may collect and process information that is derived from
Public Domain Data
, where relevant for Checks.
World-Check Users can also choose to carry out optional searches of
Public Domain Data
contained within media sources using search tools within World-Check, in order to enhance or supplement their Checks. These search tools allow World-Check Users to enter names of their customers, vendors, business partners and other counterparties alongside keywords used for research purposes into a search engine that searches media sources and returns results based on those names and keywords. Keywords can be selected by World-Check Users, but they are aimed at discovery of the type of information
listed below.
If such a search is conducted about you, your name would appear alongside any articles in which your name (or a similar name) appears, alongside any relevant keywords found in that article. However, World-Check Users know that this does not mean that either the person named in the article is actually you or that everything contained in
Public Domain Data
is true. They are obliged to take further steps to verify information and to determine how to use it.
World-Check may hold the following types of information about you.
Information that helps identify you (e.g. your name; alias (if any) age; date of birth; gender; country of residence; passport details; citizenship).
Personal identification numbers (e.g. social security numbers; national insurance numbers) that are
Public Domain Data
.
Family circumstances information (e.g. your marital status and dependents) if you are a PEP or a close associate of a PEP.
Employment/role and education details (for example, the organisation you work for, public roles (including political, diplomatic, religious, judicial, military and trade union roles), your job title and your education history).
Professional and personal affiliations (for example, organisations (including sanctioned vessels and aircraft) and individuals that you may be associated with in your professional or personal capacity).
Financial information relevant to understanding your income or wealth (for example, bankruptcy or insolvency filings).
Your inclusion (if any) on sanctions lists or on public lists of disqualified directors or other positions of responsibility.
Public Domain Data
about actual or alleged money laundering or terrorist financing crime, or crimes that are a pre-cursor to money laundering or terrorist financing which are also known as predicate offences (e.g. financial crime, illegal trafficking, environmental offences, smuggling, membership of an organised crime group).
Your postings on website, blogs or social media applications.
In some cases, the personal information on World-Check includes, depending on specific jurisdictions and their applicable data protection laws, so-called ‘sensitive’ or ‘special categories’ of personal information such as: information relating to your political opinions (for example, if you are a PEP holding a position in a political party); information relating to your sexual orientation (for example, if World-Check records that you are the spouse or partner of a PEP); information relating to your religious beliefs (for example, if you are a senior religious leader that qualifies as a PEP); information relating to your racial or ethnic origin (for example, if this can be reasonably inferred from other information about you on World-Check, such as your name, location and citizenship); information on your trade union membership (for example, if you are a senior trade unionist that qualifies as a PEP); information relating to any criminal offences actually or allegedly committed by you (for example, if these are money-laundering or terrorist financing offences, or pre-cursor crimes to such offences).
We have in place robust controls designed to ensure that information about you on World-Check is accurate, relevant and not excessive. We comply with detailed research and screening processes for sourcing World-Check information and we monitor compliance with these processes.
Back to top ↑
We use information to facilitate Checks by World-Check Users, to comply with regulatory requests and for other purposes connected with the proper management of World-Check and protection of our rights. More information on these purposes is contained below.
If your information is included on World-Check, it is processed (e.g. collected, used, shared and retained) for the purposes of:
facilitating Checks by World-Check Users;
if you contact us, dealing with your requests and enquiries;
complying with requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, including where they are outside your country of residence;
exercising our rights, and to defend ourselves from claims and to comply with laws and regulations that apply to the LSEG Group or third parties with whom we work;
services we receive from our professional advisors, such as lawyers, accountants, consultants or information security professionals;
protecting our rights; and
supporting the operation of World-Check.
Back to top ↑
Some laws require us to explain our lawful reason for processing your personal information. We process standard personal information on the basis that it is in our or others’ legitimate interests. We generally process special category and criminal data for reasons of substantial public interest on the basis of applicable law.
We are required by laws in Europe to set out in this privacy statement the legal grounds on which we rely in order to process your information.
We process your standard personal information on the basis that it is in World-Check Users’ legitimate interests to carry out Checks to ensure that they can comply with their legal and regulatory obligations and protect the public from financial crime, fraud and serious misconduct or dishonesty. In addition, it is also in our legitimate interests to carry on a business to facilitate those Checks. We and the public also have a legitimate interest in ensuring that financial crime, fraud and serious misconduct or dishonesty are prevented and detected. It is reasonable for you to expect that your information may be used for the carrying out of Checks in the public interest. You may feel that your interests differ from our and World-Check Users’ interests, as inclusion of your personal information on World-Check results in further Checks being carried out by World-Check Users prior to a decision being made about whether to enter into an arrangement with you. However, the legitimate interests in carrying out Checks would not be overridden by your interests, given the significant public interest in the carrying out of Checks.
We process your special category information on the basis that:
you have made the information manifestly public; and
in all other cases, the processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest, on the basis of applicable law (including laws designed to combat money-laundering, bribery and corruption and avoidance of sanctions).
We process information about actual or alleged criminal offences on the basis that it is authorised by applicable law.
Back to top ↑
We make World-Check information available to World-Check Users, companies within the LSEG Group that require World-Check data for products or services that they offer, third parties who provide advice and services to us (including professional advisors), business partners that work with us to make World-Check data available for the purpose of Checks and as required by, or desirable in order to comply with, law. Our third-party service providers are not permitted to share or use personal information we make available to them for any purpose other than to provide services to us.
If information about you is included on World-Check, it is made available to the following parties:
World-Check Users. We only make World-Check information available to World-Check Users that have a legitimate need to access information on World-Check. We also require that they only use it for the purposes of carrying out Checks or to otherwise comply with law. If any World-Check User uses information on World-Check beyond the limited purposes permitted by us, we may act to terminate the World-Check User’s access to World-Check.
The LSEG Group. We disclose information about you to other companies within the LSEG Group that require World-Check data for products or services that they offer, subject to compliance with robust procedures designed to protect your information.
Third Party Service Providers, Professional Advisors and Business Partners. In order to assist us in supplying and maintaining World-Check, we allow a limited number of third-party service providers to access information held by World-Check (e.g. IT systems providers, hosting providers, providers of technical support). We also allow a limited number of business partners with whom we deliver co-branded services or provide content to access World-Check data. In some cases, we also disclose information about you to our professional advisors (including lawyers, accountants, consultants and information security professionals) in connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the “How we use information about you” section.
Authorities, Courts and Tribunals. We also disclose information about you to competent authorities (including any national and/or international regulatory or enforcement body or court or other form of tribunal) in connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the “How we use information about you” above where we are required to do so or at their request.
Business Transfers. In order to participate in, or be the subject of, any sale, merger, acquisition, restructure, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceedings), we share information about you with prospective buyers, sellers, advisers or partners and your information may be a transferred asset in a business sale.
As we continue to develop our business, we may sell assets that currently form part of our business. In those circumstances, we may include information collected about you, or control of that personal information, as a business asset in any such sale. Also, in the unlikely event that we, or substantially all of our assets, are acquired, information about you, or control of such information, may be one of the transferred assets.
Back to top ↑
We take information security seriously and use a range of physical, electronic and managerial measures to keep your personal information secure, accurate and relevant. These measures and our information security policies are closely aligned with widely accepted international standards, reviewed regularly and updated as necessary to meet our business needs and changes in technology and regulatory requirements.
These policies and measures include:
robust controls around the inclusion and maintenance of World-Check information which are designed to ensure that information about you on World-Check is accurate and relevant;
education and training to relevant staff to ensure that they are aware of and comply with our policies, procedures and controls designed to keep World-Check information (including any information about you) secure, accurate and relevant;
administrative and technical controls to restrict staff access to World-Check information (including any information about you);
a business continuity and disaster recovery strategy that applies to World-Check and which is designed to safeguard the continuity of access to, and security of, World-Check;
physical security measures, such as staff security passes and strict controls on access to locations of World-Check servers;
monitoring compliance with our policies, procedures and controls.
We also impose restrictions on World-Check Users and business partners requiring them to only use information on World-Check (including any information about you) in connection with Checks.
Back to top ↑
World-Check is a global service and the LSEG Group is a global organization. Your personal information may be transferred to recipients in multiple jurisdictions, and stored and processed, outside of your home country, including in countries that may not offer the same level of protection for your personal information as your home country and which do not benefit from an adequacy determination or decision by the applicable governing bodies (e.g., the EU Commission, data protection regulator, supervisory authority, etc.). We have measures in place to ensure that when your personal information is transferred internationally, it is subject to appropriate safeguards in accordance with data protection laws (e.g. including Articles 44 to 50 of the GDPR). Often, these include contractual safeguards. More information about these safeguards (including copies, where relevant) can be obtained by
contacting us here.
Back to top ↑
How long your data is held in World-Check will depend on type of information we hold about you, details of which can be found
here.
You can find more information on the criteria used to determine retention periods below.
We calculate retention periods for your personal information in accordance with the following criteria:
the length of time your personal information remains relevant to Checks;
the length of time it is reasonable to keep records to demonstrate that we have fulfilled our duties and obligations;
any limitation periods within which claims might be made;
any retention periods prescribed by law or recommended by regulators, professional bodies or associations or inter-governmental bodies (for example, the Financial Action Task Force);
the existence of any relevant proceedings.
Back to top ↑
You may have rights under European and other laws to have access to your information and to ask us to rectify, erase and restrict use of, your information. You may also have rights to object to your information being used and to withdraw consent to the use of your information. Further information on how to exercise your rights is set out below.
Subject to certain exceptions, we will honour any rights you have under applicable data protection laws. You have the following rights under European laws in respect of personal information on World-Check, and you may have similar rights under the laws of other countries:
Right of subject access: The right to make a written request for details of your personal information and a copy of personal information we hold about you
Right to rectification: The right to have inaccurate information about you corrected or removed
Right to erasure ('right to be forgotten'): The right to have certain personal information about you erased
Right to restriction of processing: The right to request that your personal information is only used for restricted purposes
Right to object: The right to object to processing of your personal information in cases where our processing is based on the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or we have let you know the processing is necessary for our or a third party’s legitimate interests
We do not levy a charge where you wish to exercise any of your rights, but we will ask for information to verify your identity. This is to safeguard your own privacy. Any identification evidence that you provide will only be used to verify your identity for the purpose of your requests.
There are limits to the rights that you have in relation to your personal information and in certain circumstances we may not be required or able to meet your request, or we may meet your request in part only. Where this occurs, we will provide you with an explanation of the legitimate basis on which we are unable or not required to meet your request. You can also find further information on our approach towards any requests you make in the World-Check FAQ which is
available here.
See also the
“How to contact us”
section below for details of how to contact us to exercise these rights and data protection regulators if you disagree with a decision we have reached.
Back to top ↑
The
California Consumer Privacy Notice
supplements this Privacy Statement and applies solely to California consumers.
Back to top ↑
We have established processes and procedures to allow appropriate data subjects to exercise their rights under South Africa’s Protection of Personal Information Act. If you wish to exercise your rights, please visit
here
. For more information on our processes and procedures, and your rights, you can visit our
Promotion of Access to Information Manual
.
Back to top ↑
For information and disclosures applicable to data subjects covered under the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados, please visit
here
.
Back to top ↑
If you have any questions, comments, complaints or suggestions in relation to how we process your personal information, or wish to exercise your rights referred to above, please contact our Privacy Office at
contact@world-check.com
, or you may write to:
Attention: Data Protection Officer
Refinitiv Limited
10 Paternoster Square
London, EC4M 7LS
United Kingdom
If you are an EU citizen or data protection regulator, for the purposes of the GDPR, our appointed European representative is Refinitiv Ireland Limited. Our appointed representative can be contacted at
contact@world-check.com
, or you may write to:
Refinitiv Ireland Limited
12-13 Exchange Place
IFSC
Dublin, D01 P8H1
Ireland
You can also find out if information about you is on World-Check here
.
You also have a right to complain to a data protection regulator in the place where you live or work, or in the place where you think an issue in relation to your personal information has arisen. A list of national data protection regulators in the European Union can be found here:
https://www.edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
. For the Information Commissioner’s Office in the United Kingdom, please visit
https://ico.org.uk/
.
Back to top ↑
We may modify or amend this privacy statement from time to time.
Any future changes or additions to the processing of personal information as described in this privacy statement affecting you will be communicated to you through an appropriate channel, depending on how we normally communicate with you.
Does Refinitiv make my personal information on World-Check available to the general public?
No, Refinitiv does not distribute personal information on World-Check to the general public. Only authorised World-Check Users have access to that personal information.
What steps does Refinitiv take to inform World-Check Users about appropriate use of World-Check?
Refinitiv imposes usage restrictions on World-Check Users.
Why have I not been told that my personal information is on World-Check?
Your personal information has been collected from sources available to the general public and those sources generally do not provide reliable contact details such as email or postal addresses. In addition, even if we were able to find that information, we do not process detailed contact details such as this. If, however, one of the World-Check Users want to conduct a search against you on World-Check they are required to inform you of this.
Why have you not obtained my consent to your processing of my sensitive personal information?
First, as mentioned above we do not have any reliable contact details for you and second, because of the limited reasons for which we make World-Check available to World-Check Users, we are able to lawfully process your personal information without relying on your consent.
By including my personal information in World-Check are you advising your subscribers that I should be viewed negatively?
On the contrary, we make it clear that the inclusion of an individual on World-Check should not automatically be taken to draw any particular inference (negative or otherwise) about them, and this is enshrined in our usage restrictions. The personal information of many individuals is included in World-Check solely because they hold prominent political or other positions or are connected to such individuals. Furthermore, if, for example, your personal information on World-Check includes allegations about unlawful acts, we advise our users to assume that such allegations are denied by you.
Does the fact that my personal information is on World-Check automatically mean that World-Check Users cannot or will not do business with me?
No. We advise World-Check Users that they cannot rely solely upon personal information found on World-Check when making any decision to deal with any individual. Instead, they must make independent checks of such individual to verify the accuracy of the personal information we process and decide for themselves whether to conduct business with that individual.
Is the personal information in World-Check accurate?
We maintain research standards designed to ensure the accuracy and relevance of the personal information on World-Check. However, because of the nature of
Public Domain Data
, we cannot discount that data we process may contain some errors or become outdated. Therefore, if you find an error in any personal information that we process or you or believe it to be irrelevant or excessive, please send an email message to
contact@world-check.com
Please be assured that we will fully consider any communications that you send to us but it may not in every instance result in changes or deletions to the information about you on World-Check, if we conclude that the information remains accurate and relevant and/or there are other lawful grounds available to us which permit us to refrain from changing or deleting your personal information.
Can I find out what information Refinitiv has about me in World-Check?
Yes, you may request a copy of the personal information that we hold on you in World-Check. To ensure your privacy, we'll ask for information verifying your identity. To request a copy please send an email message to
contact@world-check.com
We make no charge for supplying you with your personal information.
Any identification evidence that you provide will only be used to verify your identity for this purpose and for no other. We reserve the right to deny unreasonable or unwarranted requests for access.
If you have questions about requesting a copy of your personal information, please send an email message to
contact@world-check.com
Can I have my personal information in World-Check updated or removed?
An individual may, request that his/her personal information be updated or removed from World-Check. However, it is important to note that any right you may have to request updates or deletions to your personal information on World-Check is not absolute and we may be lawfully permitted to refrain from making any update or deletion to your personal information on World-Check. In such circumstances, we will explain to you why this is the case.
Rest assured that we do, however, make extensive efforts to prevent inaccurate, outdated, irrelevant or excessive personal information being processed on World-Check.
Where you do wish to proceed with a request to update or remove your personal information from World-Check, we will need a written explanation of your request in order to assess it against applicable laws. Depending on the nature of the request and the personal information involved, we may also ask you to provide supporting information and/or documentation.
Additional questions about updating or removing your personal information or the kind of supporting documentation that may be required should be directed to
contact@world-check.com
Once a decision has been made on a request to update or remove personal information on World-Check, that decision will be communicated to you in writing.
Back to top ↑
"
Public Domain Data
” means personal information (1) originally available to the public and typically over the internet; (2) that Refinitiv has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public by or from: (i) the data subject (or consumer or individual to whom the personal information relates), (ii) widely distributed media, or (iii) from a person to whom the data subject has disclosed the personal information (provided that Refinitiv does not have knowledge that the data subject has restricted the information to a specific audience); or (3) lawfully made available from records, databases, and/or systems of government agencies, departments, divisions or other operating units, in electronic, paper or any other format. Examples include personal information found on: (i) sanction or watch lists; (ii) law enforcement, court, regulatory or other government websites; (iii) political websites and publications such as parliamentary, local government or individual politician websites; (iv) reputable news media and publications; and (v) information sources made public by an individual themselves, for example on their website, blog or any social media application.
Sub-policy 4
https://aws.amazon.com/compliance/data-privacy-faq/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Security, Identity, and Compliance
›
Compliance
›
Data Privacy
Data Privacy FAQs
Commitments
FAQs
Resources
Commitments
At AWS, customer trust is our top priority.
Maintaining customer trust is an ongoing commitment. AWS continually monitors the evolving privacy regulatory and legislative landscape to identify changes and determine what tools our customers might need to meet their compliance goals. We strive to inform you of the privacy and data security policies, practices, and technologies we’ve put in place.
Our commitments include:
Access:
As a customer, you maintain full control of your content that you upload to the AWS services under your AWS account, and responsibility for configuring access to AWS services and resources. We provide an advanced set of access, encryption, and logging features to help you do this effectively (e.g.,
AWS Identity and Access Management
,
AWS Organizations
and
AWS CloudTrail
). We also provide APIs for you to configure access control permissions for any of the services you develop or deploy in an AWS environment. We do not access or use your content for any purpose without your agreement. We do not use your content or derive information from it for marketing or advertising purposes.
Storage:
You choose the AWS Region(s) in which your content is stored. You can replicate and back up your content in more than one AWS Region. We will not move or replicate your content outside of your chosen AWS Region(s) without your agreement.
Security:
You choose how your content is secured. We offer you industry-leading encryption features to protect your content in transit and at rest, and we provide you with the option to manage your own encryption keys. These data protection features include:
Data encryption capabilities available in over 100 AWS services
.
Flexible key management options using AWS Key Management Service (KMS)
, allowing customers to choose whether to have AWS manage their encryption keys or keep complete control over their keys.
Security assurance program, using best practices for security and data protection to help you operate securely within AWS, and to make the best use of our security control environment. These security protections and control processes are independently validated by
multiple third-party independent assessments
.
Disclosure of customer content
: We will not disclose customer content (see How does AWS classify customer information? below) unless we're required to do so to comply with the law or a valid and binding order of a government body. If a governmental body sends AWS a demand for your customer content, we will attempt to redirect the governmental body to request that data directly from you. If compelled to disclose your customer content to a government body, we will give you reasonable notice of the demand to allow you to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy unless AWS is legally prohibited from doing so.
FAQs
What is customer content?
We define customer content as software (including machine images), data, text, audio, video, or images that a customer or any end user transfers to us for processing, storage, or hosting by AWS services in connection with a customer's account, and any computational results that a customer or their end user derives from the foregoing through their use of AWS services. For example, customer content includes content that a customer or their end user stores in Amazon Simple Storage Service (S3). Customer content does not include account information, which we describe below. Customer content also does not include information included in resource identifiers, metadata tags, access controls, rules, usage policies, permissions, and similar items related to the management of AWS resources. AWS recommends that you do not include personally identifying, confidential, or sensitive information in these items. The terms of the
AWS Customer Agreement
and the
AWS Service Terms
apply to your customer content.
What is account information?
We define account information as information about a customer that a customer provides to us in connection with the creation or administration of a customer account. For example, account information includes names, usernames, phone numbers, email addresses, and billing information associated with a customer account. The information practices described in the
AWS Privacy Notice
apply to account information.
Who owns customer content?
As a customer, you own your customer content, and you select which AWS services can process, store, and host your customer content. We do not access or use your customer content for any purpose without your agreement. We do not use customer content or derive information from it for marketing or advertising.
Who controls customer content?
As a customer, you control your content:
You determine the geographic region where your customer content will be stored and the type of storage.
You choose the secured state of your customer content. We offer you industry-leading encryption features to protect your content in transit and at rest, and we provide you with the option to manage your own encryption keys.
You manage access to your customer content, and access to AWS services and resources through users, groups, permissions, and credentials that you control.
How do you use my account information?
The
AWS Privacy Notice
describes how we collect and use account information.
How does AWS use information included in resource identifiers and other items related to the management of AWS resources?
AWS uses that information to provide the AWS services, and to protect and improve the customer experience. For example, AWS uses resource identifiers to help customers generate cost and usage reports, which can be used to break down AWS spend by cost center, and IAM permissions to determine whether a specific user can purchase reserved instances. When customers contact AWS for technical assistance, AWS may also analyze resource identifiers and permissions to help resolve their issues.
What happens when AWS receives a legal request for customer content?
We are vigilant about our customers' privacy. We will not disclose customer content unless we're required to do so to comply with the law or a valid and binding order of a governmental body. If a governmental body sends AWS a demand for customer content, we will attempt to redirect the governmental body to request that data directly from the customer. Governmental and regulatory bodies need to follow the applicable legal process to obtain valid and binding orders. We review all orders and object to overbroad or otherwise inappropriate ones. If compelled to disclose customer content to a government body, we will give customers reasonable notice of the demand to allow the customer to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy unless AWS is legally prohibited from doing so. It is also important to point out that our customers can encrypt their customer content, and we provide customers with the option to manage their own encryption keys.
We know that transparency matters to our customers, so we regularly publish a report about the types and volume of information requests we receive on the
Amazon Information Requests
webpage.
Where is customer content stored?
The
AWS Global Infrastructure
gives you the flexibility to choose where and how you want to run your workloads using the same network, control plane, APIs, and AWS services. If you would like to run your applications globally you can choose from any of the AWS Regions and Availability Zones. As a customer, you choose the AWS Region(s) in which your customer content is stored, allowing you to deploy AWS services in the location(s) of your choice, in accordance with your specific geographic requirements. For example, if an AWS customer in Australia wants to store their data only in Australia, they can choose to deploy their AWS services exclusively in the Asia Pacific (Sydney) AWS Region. If you want to discover other flexible storage options see the
AWS Regions
webpage.
You can also replicate and back up your customer content in more than one AWS Region. We will not move or replicate your content outside of your chosen AWS Region(s), except as necessary to provide the services you initiated, or as necessary to comply with the law or a binding order of a governmental body. However, it is important to note that some AWS services may not be available in all AWS Regions. For more information about which services are available in which AWS Regions, see the
AWS Regional Services
webpage.
What is my role in securing my content?
When evaluating the security of a cloud solution, it is important for you to understand and distinguish between the security of the cloud, and your security in the cloud. Security of the cloud encompasses the security measures that AWS implements and operates. We are responsible for security of the cloud. Security in the cloud encompasses the security measures that you implement and operate, related to the AWS services you use. You are responsible for your security in the cloud. For more information, see the
AWS Shared Responsibility
webpage.
What step does AWS take to protect my privacy?
At AWS, our highest priority is securing our customers’ data, and we implement rigorous contractual, technical, and organizational measures to protect data confidentiality, integrity, and availability regardless of which AWS Region a customer has selected.
AWS complies with ISO 27018, a code of practice that focuses on protection of personal data in the cloud. It extends ISO information security standard 27001 to cover the regulatory requirements for the protection of personally identifiable information (PII) or personal data for the public cloud computing environment and specifies implementation guidance based on ISO 27002 controls that is applicable to PII processed by public cloud service providers. For more information, or to view the AWS ISO 27018 Certification, see the
AWS ISO 27018 Compliance
webpage.
Additionally, AWS publishes a SOC 2 Type II Privacy report, based on the SOC 2 Privacy Trust Criteria developed by the American Institute of CPAs (AICPA), which establishes criteria for evaluating controls related to how personal data is collected, used, retained, disclosed, and disposed to meet the entity’s objectives. The AWS SOC 2 Type II Privacy report provides third-party attestation of our systems and the suitability of the design of our privacy controls. The scope of the privacy report includes information about how we handle the content that you upload to AWS and how it is protected in all of the services and locations that are in scope for the latest
AWS SOC reports
. The SOC 2 Type II Privacy report can be downloaded through
AWS Artifact
in the
AWS Management Console
.
Who should I contact if I have questions regarding AWS and data protection?
We recommend that customers with questions regarding AWS and data protection contact their AWS account manager. If customers have signed up for Enterprise Support, they can also reach out to their Technical Account Manager (TAM) for support. AWS account managers and TAMs work with Solutions Architects to help customers meet their compliance needs. AWS can’t provide legal advice to customers, and we recommend that customers consult their legal counsel if they have legal questions regarding data protection.
We also have teams of Enterprise Support Representatives, Professional Services Consultants, and other staff to help with privacy questions. You can contact us with questions
here
.
Resources
Data Privacy Center
Privacy Features of AWS Services
Amazon Information Requests
AWS Privacy Notice
From beginners to experts, we've got digital training courses to fit every skill level.
Explore AWS Skill Builder
»
Have Questions? Connect with an AWS Business Representative
Contact Us
Exploring compliance roles?
Apply today »
Want AWS Compliance updates?
Follow us on Twitter »
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Cryptographic Computing
Culture of Security
Open Source Security
Post-Quantum Cryptography
Provable Security
Ransomware Protection
Zero Trust
Close
Cloud Audit Academy
Compliance Overview
Compliance Programs
Services in Scope
Shared Responsibility Model
Close
Data Protection
Data Privacy Center
Digital Sovereignty
Close
AWS Marketplace
Digital Sovereignty Competency
MSSP
MSSP Competency
Partner Resources
Security Competency
Close
Confidential Computing
Customer Success Stories
Security Best Practices
Security Bulletins
Security Content
Security Learning
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Sub-policy 5
https://www.twilio.com/legal/privacy:
Print this page
Customer and Partner Agreements
Terms of Service
Acceptable Use Policy
Service and Country Specific Requirements
Data Protection Addendum (DPA)
Security Overview
Service Level Agreements
Advisory Services Terms
Professional Services Terms
Twilio Marketplace Terms
Twilio Segment Customer Data Platform Destination Integration and Listing Terms
AI/ML Terms
European Electronic Communications Code Rights Waiver
Customer Name Changes and Assignments
Updates to Legal Terms and Conditions
Privacy
Data Privacy at Twilio
Privacy Notice
Binding Corporate Rules
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
Sub-processors
GDPR
Customer Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
Mobile Application Terms
Twilio Frontline End User App Terms
Twilio Authy App Terms
Supplier Agreements
Supplier Purchase Order Terms and Conditions
Country-Specific Terms
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Code of Conduct
Intellectual Property
DMCA Policy
Trademark
Resources for Law Enforcement
Government Requests
Transparency Report
Civil Requests
Submit a request or subpoena
Code of Conduct & Ethics Hotline
Twilio Code of Conduct
Ethics and Whistleblower Hotline
Digital Promotions General Rules
Sweepstakes Rules
Customer Research and User Experience
Acknowledgement and Waiver
Legal Notices for Twilio's Web Site
Impressum (Germany)
Italy ALIAS Database Code of Conduct
Code of Conduct (Italy)
Twilio Privacy Notice
Last Updated
:
February 6, 2025
(View the prior version of our privacy notice
here
An icon of a outbound link arrow
)
Introduction
The Privacy program of Twilio Inc. and its
group companies
(‘Twilio’, ‘we’ or ‘our’) is built on our
Binding Corporate Rules
('BCRs'), which serve as our code of conduct that governs our global processing of personal data.
In order to provide products and services ('Services') to our customers and conduct our day-to-day business operations, including the operation of our websites, we collect, use and share, or otherwise process personal data about our customers, our customers’ authorized users ('end user') and their customers, our website visitors and business contacts.
Personal data
is any information that directly identifies you, such as your name and email address, or that indirectly identifies you, for example a phone number or device identifier.
The personal data we may collect and process about you varies depending on our relationship with you. We may have a direct relationship with you because you have set up an account or consented to receive marketing communications from us, or we may have an indirect relationship with you via your relationship with one of our customers; for example you may be their employee or their customer.
We take privacy, data protection and our legal obligations very seriously. We are committed to being transparent with you about how we use personal data. This Privacy Notice ('Notice') aims to describe our privacy practices in a clear, accessible and easy to understand way and to let you know how you can exercise your rights in relation to your data.
This Notice applies where Twilio processes personal data as a
data controller
, in connection with the Services we provide to our customers and the operation of our business, including our websites.  As a data controller, we determine the purpose (why) and means (how) of personal data processing and are ultimately responsible for the correct handling of your data, in accordance with applicable law.  This Notice describes our general privacy practices. Depending on how you interact with us or the specific services you use, additional privacy notices may apply. These supplemental notices will be provided to you at or before the time we collect your personal data. These supplemental notices should be read together with this Notice and are incorporated by reference.
This Notice
does not apply
to the Personal Data we process in relation to job applicants. This is covered by our
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
.
We also process personal data for most of our Services as a
data processor
. As a data processor, we process personal data related to our customers' employees, end users and customers on behalf of our customers to provide Services to them in accordance with their instructions. These instructions are set out in our customer agreements,
Data Protection Addendum
, service specific terms or through a customer's use or configuration of a product feature.  You should contact these organizations directly for information about how they process your personal data as a
data controller
and to exercise your rights in relation to that data.
Contents of our Privacy Notice
Personal Data We Process
How We Process Personal Data
How We Disclose Personal Data
International Data Transfers
How We Secure Personal Data
How Long We Retain Personal Data
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Children
Automated Decision-Making
How to Contact Us
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
Twilio Product Privacy
Personal Data We Process
The personal data we collect about you depends on your relationship with us and the purposes for which we process that personal data. The following describes the types of personal data that we collected and disclosed for a business purpose in the preceding 12 months.
Personal Data You Share With Us Directly
Contact Information -
When you sign up for a Twilio, Sendgrid or Segment account and use any of our Services, request product information, ask for a call from our sales team, or participate in events, we ask you to provide us with your name, company name, business address, phone number, email address and other contact information. We also ask you to create a password and name your account (or accounts, if you have more than one).
Customer Account Data -
We process certain personal data to manage our relationship with you and administer you or your company’s account. This includes purchase history, names or contact information of individuals authorized to manage the Twilio account on behalf of our customer to set up, access and manage billing. We also collect personal data required to administer use of your account and the Services, and information to allow us to verify your identity for Know Your Customer or other identity verification purposes.
Customer Content -
We receive and store the content of communications received from you or our customers and other personal data uploaded to the Services or generated for our customers’ use as part of the Services, which we may be authorized by you or our customer to use, where necessary for specific legitimate business purposes and in accordance with applicable law.
Marketing and Contact Preferences -
We use information about how you would like to be contacted and choices you have made to send you marketing communications.
Payment Information -
In connection with Services you pay for, we ask you to provide our payment processor with your payment method information like a credit card or your Paypal account and your billing address. Our payment processor, acting on our behalf, gathers this so we can bill you for your use of our Services. Our payment processor will share your billing address with Twilio for this purpose.
Personalization Details -
Some of our products, such as our short code service, may require you to complete an application form by providing details about your or your company’s  intended use of the product to determine eligibility for these products.
Professional Information -
The information we process about you with respect to your employment or profession, including company, job title, email address, phone number and online business networking profile.
Subscriber Records -
For some of our communications products, we may also obtain proof of identity from you or our customer that includes a proof of address, name, physical address, or other identification information. For example, to use our
Trust Hub
or to obtain a phone number in certain countries, local law may require us to have a physical service address on file for the individual who will be using that Twilio number, whether that’s you or our customer's end user.
Support and Feedback -
When you interact with us on our websites including through our AI chatbots (e.g. our Help Center Assistant), over the phone or via email, we process the phone number or email address that you use, the content of your interaction and the feedback you provide about our Services. You may also provide us with feedback about our Services in surveys and questionnaires. We will let you know when a call may be recorded, in accordance with applicable law.
Personal Data We Generate or Collect Automatically
Communications Usage Data -
When you or our customers use Twilio communications products, we collect electronic communications metadata, such as phone numbers and routing information, the source and destination of a communication, location of the device generated in the context of delivering the communication, date, time, duration and type of communication, status of the message, error data and traffic records.
Device Information and IP Addresses -
When you use our account portal, we collect your IP address and device information through tracking technologies like cookies, web beacons, pixels, and similar technologies. We also collect IP addresses when you make requests to our APIs and in our server logs. Additionally, we collect information about your device, such as your computer or mobile device operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model, browser type, screen resolution, unique identifiers, and general location information such as city or town when you use our account portal.
We do not collect precise geolocation information.
Online Activity Information -
When you visit Twilio websites, including our web forms, we use tracking technologies such as cookies, web beacons, and pixels to collect the following data: your device and browser, time zone setting, web pages visited, products you view or search for, page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information, IP address.
Security Identifiers or SIDs -
When you sign up for an account with Twilio, we’ll automatically assign you and each of your accounts a unique security ID and generate an API token for each account. We keep a record of these credentials so we know it is you making the requests when your application makes requests to our API using these credentials.
Customer Proprietary Network Information -
When you use certain US voice-based communications services, Twilio collects information associated with your service usage. This includes information such as the number of phone calls, call destinations, call locations, type, and service configuration, and is known as Customer Proprietary Network Information ('CPNI'). CPNI does not include information such as your name, address, phone number, or the content of phone calls. We use CPNI to market Twilio-related Services to which you are not already subscribed unless you have exercised your right to opt out. For information about your CPNI choices, see the section “
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
” below.
Personal Data Collected From Other Sources
Add-On Service Data -
In the event you purchase our Services through one of our
Add-On Partners
, they may share your personal data with us to fulfill their contractual obligations. Add-On Partners may share your personal data in the form of leads when you download Twilio content on the Add-On Partner’s website or you participate in events and webinars of which Twilio is a sponsor.
Professional Data -
We collect certain personal data such as employment or professional information from sources other than you. We may combine this data with other personal data that you share with us.
Publicly-Available Sources -
We may also use publicly-available information about you that we have gathered through services like LinkedIn, or we may obtain information about you or your company from third party providers, such as your industry, the size of your company, and your company’s website URL.
Social Media Data -
Social media service providers such as Google, LinkedIn, and Meta may provide us with information about you, in accordance with your privacy settings on those sites.
Telecommunication Data -
We receive communication-related data from telecommunications operators, aggregators and carriers that may include phone type, carrier history, SIM status and history, city and/or country where phone was first registered, contract and account type, IP address city and/or country and a validation result of personal data provided by our customer and whether it matches data held by the carrier.
How We Process Personal Data
The purposes for which we process personal depends on your relationship with us. We only use personal data that is necessary to fulfill the specified purposes listed below as applicable to you and in accordance with applicable data protection law.
Purpose
Personal Data Processed
Legal Basis for Processing
Creating and managing accounts, including verification of the identity of our customer’s end user for Know-Your-Customer (KYC) or identity verification purposes.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Professional Information
Subscriber Records
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Carrying out Twilio’s core business operations, such as account administration, accounting, auditing and compliance, business analytics, filing taxes, finance, forecasting, consolidated management and reporting, product strategy and revenue planning.
Add-On Service Data
Professional Information
Customer Account Data
Support and Feedback
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Billing and relationship management.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Legitimate Interest
Providing, optimizing and maintaining our Services and, platform, including debugging and troubleshooting.
Add-On Service Data
Subscriber Records
Online Activity Information
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Preventing, detecting and investigating security incidents and managing the security of Twilio’s platform, services, websites and accounts.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Preventing, detecting, or investigating abuse or misuse of Twilio’s platform or Services , including spam, fraud, illegal activities, or violations of the
Twilio Acceptable Use Policy
,
or assisting telecommunications service providers, regulators, or law enforcement agencies with combating spam, fraud, or illegal activities.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Contact Information
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Telecommunications Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Determining eligibility for certain Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Payment Information
Personalization Details
Subscriber Records
Legitimate Interest
For routing and connectivity purposes to send messages on behalf of our customers, including transmitting, distributing and exchanging communications using phone numbers, either through the public switched telephone network or other communications networks.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Legitimate Interest
Providing customer support, including responding to your requests and communicating with you about your account and use of the services, including suspicious activity or security alerts.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Professional Information
Support and Feedback
Security Identifier
Other personal data provided by requestor
Legitimate interest
Sending important notifications about our Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Complying with legal and regulatory obligations, telecommunication service provider requirements and communications industry codes of practice.
Subscriber Records
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Sending marketing communications in accordance with your marketing preferences.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Analyzing your interest in our Services and delivering marketing campaigns that are relevant to you.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Deploying cookies and other tracking technologies in accordance with your online settings.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Understanding how visitors navigate our websites, and tracking and optimizing the performance of our advertising activities.
Device Information
Online Activity Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Understanding how customers are using our platform and improving the website navigation experience.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Online Activity Information
Professional Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Conducting questionnaires and surveys to improve our Services and provide training to our employees.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Personalization Details
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Managing your participation in our events and webinars and granting you access to whitepapers and on-demand resources.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Collecting sales insights and performing lead scoring.
Contact Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing our business by updating, expanding, and analyzing our customer relationship records.
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Identifying potential job candidates.
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing or improving our Services, including anonymizing, de-identifying, pseudonymizing and aggregating personal data for this purpose.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Personalization Details
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
As otherwise authorized by you or our customer in Service specific terms or through your or our customer’s use and configuration of features in a product.
Data used will vary based on customer authorization
Legitimate Interest
Protecting the health and safety of our employees, visitors and our properties.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legal Obligation
Protecting the rights and freedoms of individuals, meeting legal or regulatory obligations, including complying with valid court orders, disclosure requests, subpoenas, and other appropriate legal mechanisms.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Security Identifier
Legal Obligation
Legitimate Interest
How We Disclose Personal Data
We disclose personal data to third parties in limited circumstances in order to provide the Services and to otherwise run our business. Below are the different scenarios under which we may disclose your data to third parties.
Telecommunications Service Providers
Twilio’s communications products provide an easier way for developers to build applications that make use of the publicly switched telephone network ('PSTN') to send communications. Therefore, we engage with a global network of telecommunications operators, aggregators, carriers and other communication service providers (collectively, “telecommunications service providers”) as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How telecommunications service providers handle this data is generally determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Where telecommunications service providers transmit the content of a communication, they function neither as data controllers nor data processors, instead they act simply as a conduit to transmit communication content. In the event telecommunications services providers process any personal data for their own purposes such as communications metadata required to transmit the message, or for billing or fraud prevention purposes, they also act as data controllers.
We may have to share Subscriber Records with local government authorities or local telecommunications carriers that provide connectivity services. However, we don’t share subscriber records for purposes other than this, and we treat these records with our highest confidentiality.
Other Communications Service Providers
For proper routing and connectivity, Twilio also enables sending or receiving communications through communications service providers that do not use the PSTN, these are referred to as Over-the-Top ('OTT') communications service providers. If you or our customer chooses to use Twilio to send or receive communications by way of these providers, Twilio will disclose communications content and other data to these providers as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How those OTT communications service providers, as data controllers, handle this data is determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Third Party Service Providers
Twilio engages third-party vendors and service providers to carry out certain personal data processing functions on our behalf. These providers are limited to only accessing or using personal data to provide services to us and must provide reasonable assurances they will appropriately safeguard the data.
Add-On Partners
Add-ons are additional features, functionality or services offered by Twilio’s Add-on partners (who are third parties not affiliated with Twilio). Twilio may make Add-ons available through the Twilio Marketplace. Some Add-ons may need to access or collect some of your information, including personal data. If you choose to use an Add-on, Twilio will disclose your information to the Add-on partner so you can use the Add-on. Twilio does not control Add-on partners’ use of your information and their use of your information will be in accordance with their own policies. If you do not want your information to be disclosed to an Add-on partner, then you should not use the Add-on.
Twilio Group Members
We may disclose your personal data among Twilio Group Members. Twilio Group Members will only use the information as described in this Notice. Twilio Group Members are listed in Appendix 1 in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
We may disclose your personal data to a third party if:
If we reasonably believe that disclosure is compelled by applicable law, regulation, legal process, or a government request (including to meet national security, emergency services, or law enforcement requirements);
to enforce our agreements and policies;
to protect the security or integrity of our Services;
to protect ourselves, our other customers, or the public from harm or illegal activities, including security threats, spam and fraud; or
to respond to an emergency which we believe in good faith requires us to disclose data to assist in preventing a death or serious bodily injury.
For more details, please see the procedure laid out in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
If Twilio is required by law to disclose any personal data about you, we will notify you or our customers of the disclosure requirement to the extent legally permitted and where Twilio determines such disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation. Further, we object to information requests we do not believe were issued properly.
Business Transfers
In connection with a corporate sale, merger, reorganization, dissolution or similar event, personal data about you may be part of the assets transferred or disclosed in connection with the due diligence for any such transaction. If required by law, we will notify you prior to such a transfer and provide you with information about any choices you may have with respect to your personal data.
Aggregated, Anonymized or De-identified Data
Aggregated, anonymized and de-identified data may be derived by Twilio from your personal data but is generally not considered personal data under data protection law as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. We may use and disclose de-identified, anonymized or aggregated data to third parties. We do not disaggregate or reidentify de-identified data.
International Data Transfers
As a global organization, we may need to transfer your personal data to Twilio affiliates, contractors, service providers and third parties in various countries and jurisdictions around the world. When we transfer your personal data, we take care to use appropriate safeguards to ensure your personal data remains protected.
Data Transfers to the United States and Elsewhere
When you use our account portal, or our other Services, your personal data may be transferred to the United States, where our primary processing facilities are located, and possibly to other countries where we or our service providers operate.
Safeguards for Data Transfers
Twilio employs appropriate safeguards for cross-border transfers of personal data, as required by applicable local law.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF“)
As set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce Twilio is officially certified under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF and relies on these certifications as its primary transfer mechanisms for transfers of personal data from the EU and Switzerland to the U.S. Twilio adheres to the DPF principles for onward transfers of personal data to third parties and remains liable for damages caused by third parties under the DPF unless Twilio did not cause the event giving rise to damage. The U.S. Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Twilio’s compliance with the DPF. To learn more about the DPF Program, and to view our certifications, please visit the
DPF website
.
Twilio’s Binding Corporate Rules
Twilio has established and implemented a set of
Binding Corporate Rules
for internal transfers of personal data between Twilio Group Members in the European Union and Twilio Group Members elsewhere as a data controller. Twilio’s BCRs have been approved by European Union Data Protection Authorities and are a commitment by Twilio to adequately protect personal data that Twilio processes regardless of where the information resides. You can access Twilio’s BCR-Controller Policy
here
.
Where neither the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Swiss-EU DPF nor Twilio's BCRs apply, we rely instead on other data transfer mechanisms to transfer personal data outside the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, such as Standard Contractual Clauses and the UK’s International Data Transfer Agreement.
APEC CBPR & PRP Participation
Twilio’s privacy practices, described in this Notice, comply with the APEC Cross Border Privacy Rules (“CBPR”) and Privacy Recognition for Processors (“PRP”) Systems. The APEC, CBPR and PRP systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating APEC economies. More information about the APEC framework can be found
here
.
How We Secure Personal Data
To protect personal data from loss, or unauthorized use, access or disclosure, Twilio uses reasonable and appropriate security measures designed to protect the security of your personal data both online and offline. These measures vary based on the sensitivity of the personal data we collect, process and store and the current state of technology.  All systems used to support our business are governed by Twilio’s Information Security Policy and Standards which are built on industry standards and best practices such as the ISO 27001 and NIST standards. More information about our security measures can be found in our
Security Overview
.
How Long We Retain Personal Data
We endeavor not to retain personal data in a form which permits identification of individuals for longer than is necessary for the purposes for which that data is processed. We retain personal data in accordance with Twilio's record retention policies and guidelines as revised and updated from time to time.
Twilio will store your Customer Account Data as long as needed to provide you or our customer with the Services and to operate our business. If you ask Twilio to delete specific personal data from your Customer Account Data (see ‘
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
’ below), we will honor this request, unless deleting that information prevents us from carrying out necessary business functions, such as billing for our services, calculating taxes, or conducting required audits.
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
Depending on the data protection laws applicable to you, you may have the following rights in relation to your personal data that we process as a data controller:
that we provide details about the categories of personal data that we collect about you, including how we collect and share it;
that we provide you access to, and a copy of, the personal data we collect about you;
that we update or correct any inaccurate personal data we have about you;
that we delete the personal data we have about you;
that we restrict processing of personal data about you;
that we provide you with your personal data in a structured, commonly used format and to transmit that information to another controller, and where feasible, transmit the information directly;
that we provide you with the right to object to the processing of personal data, including profiling;
that we provide you with a free, easy mechanism to object to use of your personal information for direct marketing purposes;
that you not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, that produces legal effects or similarly affects your individual rights;
to withdraw your consent; and
to complain to a competent supervisory authority and/or to commence proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction.
Twilio will honor your rights subject to limitations in certain situations, such as where Twilio can demonstrate that it has a legal requirement or legitimate interest to process your data or can legitimately apply an exemption to the exercise of a right under applicable law. More information about these rights can be found in our Binding Corporate Rules Controller Policy
Rule 10
and
Appendix 3
.
If you are a
US resident
interested in what personal data we have disclosed lately for our business purposes, here’s a list:
Identifiers
Commercial information
Financial information
Internet or other electronic activity information
Geolocation information
Professional or employment information
By “our business purposes,” we mean that we only disclose personal data as we describe in the section "
How We Disclose Personal Data
" above.  Also, as described in the “How We Use Cookies & Other Tracking technologies” section below, we process personal data to deliver ads targeted to your interests on other companies’ websites and mobile apps. Some of these activities may be considered “sharing” or “targeted advertising” under certain laws. You have the right to opt out of the processing of your personal data for targeted advertising, and can do so by adjusting your preferences using our Cookie Preferences Tool located on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
You also have the right to request the restriction of processing of your sensitive personal information. Where applicable, the respective sensitive personal information will be marked accordingly and may only be processed by us for certain purposes. At the current time, however, we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those expressed in this Privacy Notice or otherwise permitted by applicable law, and these uses cannot be limited under California law.
You may have additional rights under our
Binding Corporate Rules
in the EU. For example, where you believe your personal data has been transferred by an EU-based Twilio company to our US headquarters and processed by the US company in breach of the Binding Corporate Rules, you may have a right to:
Lodge a complaint with the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe;
Lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority in the same country as the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe; and
Bring a court action against the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe.
If Twilio processes your personal data as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will either direct you to contact our customer to exercise your rights.
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
The following sections provide information about how to exercise certain rights in relation to your personal data. To exercise any other rights, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
Accessing and Controlling Account Data
As part of our Services, we provide you with a number of self-service features at no additional cost within the Twilio console itself, including the ability to access your data, update any incorrect data, download a copy of your data, delete your data, or restrict the use of your data. You can make various choices about your Customer Account Data through the account portal when you log into your Twilio account or through the marketing preferences center. Any other requests about your data you cannot make through these self-service tools, you can request by contacting
Customer Support
.
Closing Your Account and Deletion
To request closure or deletion of your Twilio account, you can contact
Customer Support
. Please be aware that closure or deletion of your Twilio account will result in you permanently losing access to your account and the data in the account. After closure of your account, certain information associated with your account may remain on Twilio’s servers in an aggregated form that does not identify you. Similarly, after you close your account, we will retain data — including personal data — associated with your account that we are required to maintain for legal purposes or for necessary business operations (see “
How Long We Retain Personal  Data
” section above) until it’s no longer needed.
Identity Verification
In some instances, we will need to verify your identity before honoring your request. We will generally verify your identity by asking you to provide personal data related to your recent interactions with us. Thereafter, we will process your request and inform you of any decisions we have made about your request.  Additionally, you may exercise your privacy rights through an authorized agent. If we receive your request from an authorized agent, we may ask for evidence that you have provided such agent with a power of attorney or that the agent otherwise has valid written authority to submit requests to exercise rights on your behalf. If you are an authorized agent seeking to make a request, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
We won’t discriminate against you or change the price of our services if you make a request, but if you ask us to delete your data, it may affect your ability to use our Services.
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
As an individual Twilio account holder or as an authorized representative of a Twilio customer in the US, you have the right to restrict Twilio’s use of
CPNI
. To opt-out of the use of CPNI data related to your Twilio account to market other Twilio Services based on your usage of our Services, click
here
.  Please note that, if you have subscribed for the services on behalf of an organization, the CPNI relates to the service usage by that organization and not you individually. Opting-out of the use of CPNI for marketing will not unsubscribe you from other types of marketing contacts from Twilio and will not affect the status of the services you currently have with us. Your approval or opt-out of the use of your CPNI outside of the services to which you are already subscribed is valid until you affirmatively revoke or limit such approval.
Communication Preferences
You can opt out of receiving marketing communications from us at any time through your marketing preferences page by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from Twilio. You can also
update your communication preferences
using our online form or contact our
Customer Support
Team to communicate your choice to opt out. Please note that it may take up to three days to remove your contact information from our marketing communications lists, so you may receive correspondence from us for a short time after you make your request. You will not be able to opt out of service emails from us, such as password reset emails, billing emails, or notifications of updates to our terms, unless you deactivate your account.
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Twilio uses common information gathering tools such as cookies, web beacons, pixels and other similar tracking technologies to automatically collect information as you navigate our websites, your account or when you interact with emails we send to you.
Cookies
A cookie is a small text file that is stored in your browser or elsewhere on your hard drive. Cookies allow Twilio to identify your device as you navigate our websites or your account. This makes navigating and interacting with our websites or your account more efficient, easy and meaningful for you.
Twilio uses both session and persistent cookies. Session cookies are cookies that disappear from your computer or browser when you turn off your computer. Persistent cookies stay on your computer even after you’ve turned it off.
The cookies on our websites fall into three categories: (1) Required Cookies, (2) Functional Cookies, and (3) Advertising Cookies. To learn more about each category of cookie, you can visit our cookie consent tool by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting.
Manage Your Cookie Preferences
Twilio uses a cookie consent tool, which you can utilize to customize your cookie preferences. When you visit our website for the first time, a cookie consent banner will pop up and ask you to customize your cookie preferences. If you decide to change your preferences at a later date, you can easily do so by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Please note that Required Cookies cannot be disabled and if you decide to opt-out of Functional Cookies, certain functionality of our websites or your account may be impacted.  Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
Manage Cookies Using Your Browser
In addition to using our Cookie Consent tool, you can use your browser settings to opt out of Functional Cookies and Advertising Cookies. For more information on how to do that, click
here
. To manage privacy and storage settings for cookies, click
here
.
Universal Opt-Out Mechanisms
Global Privacy Control (GPC) and Do Not Track (DNT) are tools that you can use to inform websites of your privacy preferences in regard to ad trackers. To set up GPC, you can visit the
Global Privacy Control
page. To set DNT, you can visit the
All About DNT
page. Please note that this may impact the functionality of our websites or your account.
Opt Out of Advertising Cookies
To learn more about how to opt out of targeting and advertising cookies, you can go to the
Your Online Choices
page, the
Network Advertising Initiative
page, and the
Digital Advertising Alliance’s Consumer Choice
page. These opt-out tools are provided by third parties, not Twilio. We do not control or operate these tools or the choices that advertisers and others provide through these tools.
Web Beacons
Twilio also uses web beacons to gather data about your use of our websites, your account, and how you interact with emails we have sent to you. Web beacons are clear electronic images that can recognize certain types of data on your computer, like when you view a particular website tied to the web beacon, and a description of a website tied to the web beacon. Additionally, we may put web beacons in marketing emails that notify us when you click on a link in the email that directs you to a Twilio website.
Children
Our Services are not directed to or intended to be used by children (under the age of 13 in the US and UK, or 16 in the EEA). We do not knowingly permit children to sign up for a Twilio account. If we become aware that a child has signed up for an account, we will take reasonable steps to deactivate the account and remove their personal data from our records as quickly as possible. If you believe an underage person has signed up for a Twilio account, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
with the subject line “Children”.
Automated Decision Making
Automated decision-making occurs when an electronic system uses personal data to make a decision about you, without human involvement. Twilio uses automated decision-making leveraging a variety of signals derived from records we collect or obtain from third party vendors, to help monitor, identify, and suspend accounts sending spam or engaging in other abusive or fraudulent activity.  We may also use this information to evaluate your account application and make decisions about whether to approve or decline. If your account is suspended or not approved under these circumstances you will be notified and given an opportunity to request human review of the decision.
We may rely on other automated decision-making where:
We have notified you of the decision and provided you with the opportunity to request a human review of the decision
It is necessary to perform a contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
We have your consent and we have put in place appropriate measures to safeguard your rights
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions, concerns or complaints about this Notice or our data protection practices, please do not hesitate to contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing us at
privacy@twilio.com
or by writing to us at any of the following addresses:
Worldwide Headquarters
Twilio Inc.
101 Spear Street, 5th Floor
San Francisco CA 94105
EEA Headquarters
Twilio Ireland Limited
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay
Dublin 2
D02 R296, Ireland
Complaints
We will endeavor to resolve questions, concerns or complaints you raise with us in accordance with our
Complaints Handling Procedure
. In the unlikely event that we are unable to resolve your concern, you can find information about your options to seek assistance through independent dispute resolution mechanisms or complaints to your local data protection authority
here
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Twilio commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States, the European Union, the United Kingdom, and/or Switzerland. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance that are not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms. You can find more information in the DPF
ANNEX-I-introduction.
If your question or complaint relates to personal data we process as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will direct you to contact our customer to address your question or complaint.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We will periodically review this Notice and may change it to address legal, technical or business development requirements or make clarifications. When we change this Notice, the most current version will be available at
https://www/twilio.com/legal/privacy
with the date indicating when it was last updated. If we make material changes that affect your rights, we will provide you with advance notice, such as by posting a message in the Twilio console or sending an email to the address we have on file for you. We will comply with applicable law with respect to any changes we make to this Notice. We will also seek your consent to material changes, where required by applicable law.
Twilio Product Privacy
Twilio offers a range of industry-leading communications and customer data platform services to our customers. Depending on the Service, Twilio may be a data controller and data processor of personal data used to provide the Services.
Twilio processes personal data (Communications Usage Data and Customer Content) for most of our Services as a data processor acting on the instruction of our customer and in accordance with the terms of our agreement with a customer, our
Data Protection Addendum
, and service specific terms. Our Services provide customers with ways to control, access and secure their data.
We also offer customers the ability to store, delete, access, or exercise other choices about their personal data. The ability to make these choices depends on the Service being used and how it is being used by a customer. Customers are referred to our
API docs
for each of our Services, along with SendGrid’s
documentation
and Segment’s
documentation
to find more detailed information about managing personal data collected and stored in connection with their use of our Services. We also provide an overview of our retention and deletion practices, including how to delete data you control in our
support documentation
. We provide information about the security measures we use to protect our customer’s data  in our
Security Overview
, and if you are located in a country that requires you to obtain information about our supplemental measures, you may read more about those measures
here
.
For some of the Services we also act as a data controller where disclosed and agreed to by our customer in the agreement, Data Protection Addendum, product specific terms or via the customers’ use and configuration of a product or feature.As a data controller, Twilio is responsible for the processing of the personal data.
For more detail on our Services, please find information below or by visiting our
products page
.
Authy
The Authy service is our standalone two-factor authentication (2FA) service for desktop and mobile. The Authy apps generate one time passwords and push notifications that can be used as a part of a two-step verification process with your Authy-compatible accounts to add another layer of security. Authy’s 2FA can be used on its own or with applications that directly integrate with Authy’s 2-factor authentication API.
Due to the nature of the Authy service, Twilio collects the following additional personal data elements to our other Services:
Identifiers
Once you open the Authy app, we ask you to provide us with a phone number to create your Authy account. We send a verification code to that phone number to be sure that the person creating the Authy account also has control over the phone number entered. This phone number is considered your “primary device,” and will be the identifier for your Authy account. We use that phone number to identify you, to provide you 2FA services, and to maintain logs for security and anti-fraud purposes. We also collect your email address, and we use it for identity verification and account recovery purposes.
Device Information
When you download and open the Authy desktop or mobile app, we automatically collect information about the type of device you have downloaded the app on and your device identifier. We collect this to ensure we deliver the right version of the app for your device and so that we can provide appropriate follow up support as necessary. We also use your device information to ensure proper delivery of our service and to provide and deliver support and maintenance of the Authy app.
Login History and Authy Account History
When you use an Authy token to log into an account, whether the token was generated on the app or one sent to you via your phone number, we collect and keep information associated with your login activity including information like your IP address, what application you logged in to, that you logged in, and when. If you change your phone number or email associated with your Authy account, we will also keep a log of that. We collect this information to monitor for suspicious activity and also as another piece of information that could be used to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Geolocation information
If you have location services turned on, we collect your location based on your IP address. We use this information for anti-fraud purposes, to check for suspicious activity and as another piece of information we can use to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Frontline Services
To use the Frontline services, you must log in to the Frontline app using a third party account (through your Single Sign-On provider). The authentication of your login details is handled by that third party and we only collect the information you expressly agree to share with us at the time you give permission to link the Frontline app with the third party account. We only gather the information you and our customers give us access to, and we only use it for the purposes for which you and our customers have provided it to us. Please see the
Frontline App Terms
for specific details about your relationship with us.
SendGrid Services
The SendGrid services also collect additional data in the form of web beacons placed in the body of emails delivered using the SendGrid platform. This allows us to keep track of whether or not an email has been delivered, opened, clicked on, whether it bounced or was treated as spam. You can learn more about web beacons in the section titled “
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
” above.
Voice Intelligence
Voice Intelligence incorporates artificial intelligence and machine learning to transcribe and analyze voice calls into a structured format that allows our customers to drive their business processes. To translate voice calls into structured content, Twilio processes certain data as a controller, including personal data contained in voice calls disclosed to us by our customer through their use of the service.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Legal
Open Menu
Close Menu
Hardware
Software
Sales & Support
Internet Services
Intellectual Property
More Resources
JavaScript is required to view this content.
Something went wrong.
The content for this page did not load correctly. Reload the page to try again.
Reload Page
Sub-policy 7
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:

Sub-policy 8
https://tealium.com/privacy-policy/:
EFFECTIVE September 1, 2024
Privacy Policy (Notice)
This privacy policy (“Policy”) describes how the personally identifiable information (“Personal Information”) you may provide on the tealium.com website (“Website” ) and any of its related products and services (collectively, “Services”) is collected, protected and used. It also describes the choices available to you regarding our use of your Personal Information and how you can access and update this information. This Policy is a legally binding agreement between you (“User”, “you” or “your”) and Tealium Inc. (“Tealium”, “we”, “us” or “our”). By accessing and using the Website and Services, you acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree to be bound by the terms of this Policy. This Policy does not apply to the practices of companies that we do not own or control, or to individuals that we do not employ or manage.
Automatic collection of information
When you use the Website and Services, we automatically record information that your browser sends. This data may include information such as your device’s IP address, browser type, and version, operating system type and version, language preferences or the webpage you were visiting before you came to the Website and Services, pages of the Website and Services that you visit, the time spent on those pages, the information you search for, access times and dates, and other statistics.
Information collected automatically is used to identify potential cases of abuse and establish statistical information regarding the usage and traffic of the Website and Services.
Collection of personal information
You can access and use the Website without telling us who you are or revealing any information by which someone could identify you as a specific, identifiable individual. If, however, you wish to use some of the features on the Website, you may be asked to provide certain Personal Information (for example, your name and email address). We receive and store any information you knowingly provide to us when you publish content, or fill any online forms on the Website. When required, this information may include the following:
– Personal details such as name, country of residence, etc.
– Contact information such as email address, address, etc.
– Geolocation data such as latitude and longitude.
Some of the information we collect is directly from you via the Website and Services. However, we may also collect Personal Information about you from other sources such as public databases and our joint marketing partners. You can choose not to provide us with your Personal Information when using the Website, but then you may not be able to take advantage of some of the features on the Website. Users who are uncertain about what information is mandatory are welcome to contact us.
Use and processing of collected information
In order to make the Website and Services available to you, or to meet a legal obligation, we may need to collect and use certain Personal Information. If you do not provide the information that we request, we may not be able to provide you with the requested products or services. Any of the information we collect from you may be used for the following purposes:
– Send marketing and promotional communications
– Respond to inquiries and offer support
– Improve the user experience
– Post customer testimonials
– Deliver targeted advertising
– Run and operate the Website and Services
Processing your Personal Information depends on how you interact with the Website and Services, where you are located in the world, and if one of the following applies: (i) you have given your consent for one or more specific purposes; (ii) provision of information is necessary for the performance of an agreement with you and/or for any pre-contractual obligations thereof; (iii) processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which you are subject; (iv) processing is related to a task that is carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in us; (v) processing is necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party.
Note that under some legislations we may be allowed to process Personal Information until you object to such processing (by opting out), without having to rely on consent or any other of the legal bases above. In any case, we will be happy to clarify the specific legal basis that applies to the processing.
Disclosure of information
Depending on the requested services or as necessary to complete any transaction or provide any service you have requested, we may share your information with your consent with our trusted third parties that work with us. A list of those trusted third-parties can be found here: https://tealium.com/subprocessors/. We do not share Personal Information with unaffiliated third parties. These service providers are not authorized to use or disclose your information except as necessary to perform services on our behalf or comply with legal requirements. We may share your Personal Information for these purposes only with third parties whose privacy policies are consistent with ours or who agree to abide by our policies with respect to Personal Information. These third parties are given Personal Information they need only in order to perform their designated functions, and we do not authorize them to use or disclose Personal Information for their own marketing or other purposes.
We will disclose any Personal Information we collect, use or receive if required or permitted by law, such as to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate fraud, or respond to a government request.
Retention of information
We will retain and use your Personal Information for the period necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements, unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law. We may use any aggregated data derived from or incorporating your Personal Information after you update or delete it, but not in a manner that would identify you personally. Once the retention period expires, Personal Information shall be deleted. Therefore, the right to access, the right to erasure, the right to rectification, and the right to data portability cannot be enforced after the expiration of the retention period.
Transfer of information
Depending on your location, data transfers may involve transferring and storing your Personal Information in a country other than your own. When we transfer your Personal Information, we make sure that we take steps to  safeguard your information. If any such transfer takes place, you can find out more by checking the relevant sections of this Policy or inquire with us using the information provided in the contact section.
Data Privacy Framework Program
Tealium complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Tealium has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Tealium has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Tealium commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Rights
You may contact us using the contact information below at any time. In addition, you can refine your data collection and privacy preferences by using our Privacy Manager, where you can decide what data is collected about you based on specific purposes. For example, if you are happy to let us track how you use our website, as long as we do not use that for advertising purposes you can simply disable data collection for advertising purposes, while leaving analytics tracking on in our Privacy Manager (
https://tealium.com/preferences
).
Tealium’s marketing emails contain instructions, including an “unsubscribe link” on how to opt out of receiving marketing emails from Tealium. You can also unsubscribe here https://tealium.com/preferences.
You can also exercise any of the rights stated below via our Data Subject Access Request page
https://tealium.com/data-subject-access-request-form/
, by emailing us at  or via postage at the following address: 9605 Scranton Road, Suite 600, San Diego, CA 92121
You may exercise certain rights regarding your information processed by us. In particular, you have the right to do the following
you have the right to withdraw consent where you have previously given your consent to the processing of your information;
you have the right to object to the processing of your information if the processing is carried out on a legal basis other than consent;
you have the right to learn if information is being processed by us, obtain disclosure regarding certain aspects of the processing and obtain a copy of the information undergoing processing;
you have the right to verify the accuracy of your information and ask for it to be updated or corrected;
you have the right, under certain circumstances, to restrict the processing of your information, in which case, we will not process your information for any purpose other than storing it;
you have the right, under certain circumstances, to obtain the erasure of your Personal Information from us; and
you have the right to receive your information in a structured, commonly used and machine readable format and, if technically feasible, to have it transmitted to another controller without any hindrance. This provision is applicable provided that your information is processed by automated means and that the processing is based on your consent, on a contract which you are part of, or on pre-contractual obligations thereof.
Choice
If personal data covered by this Privacy Policy is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which the personal data was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is to be disclosed to a non-agent third party in a manner not specified in this policy, Tealium will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data so used or disclosed. Requests to opt out of such uses or disclosures of Personal Data should be sent to us as specified in the “How to Contact Us” section below. Certain personal data, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, is considered “Sensitive Information.” Tealium will not use Sensitive Personal for a purpose other than the purpose for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized by the individual unless Tealium has received your affirmative and explicit consent (opt-in).
Accountability for Onward Transfer
If you are an EU, UK, or Swiss Individual, where we transfer your personal data to a third party service provider (see above) who performs services for us or on our behalf, we are responsible for the processing of that data by them and shall remain liable if they process your personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles referred to on this page, unless we prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
California privacy rights
In addition to the rights as explained in this Policy, California residents who provide Personal Information (as defined in the statute) to obtain products or services for personal, family, or household use are entitled to request and obtain from us, once a calendar year, information about the Personal Information we shared, if any, with other businesses for marketing uses. If applicable, this information would include the categories of Personal Information and the names and addresses of those businesses with which we shared such personal information for the immediately prior calendar year (e.g., requests made in the current year will receive information about the prior year). To obtain this information please contact us.
You may opt out of “sales” of personal information and “sharing” of personal information for purposes of cross-context behavioral advertising.
Where required, we also honor requests to opt out submitted via privacy preference signals recognized under applicable law, such as the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”). For more information on the GPC and how to use a browser or browser extension incorporating the GPC signal, see
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/
.
How to exercise these rights
Any requests to exercise your rights can be directed to Tealium through the contact details provided in this document. Please note that we may ask you to verify your identity before responding to such requests. Your request must provide sufficient information that allows us to verify that you are the person you are claiming to be or that you are the authorized representative of such person. You must include sufficient details to allow us to properly understand the request and respond to it. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with Personal Information unless we first verify your identity or authority to make such a request and confirm that the Personal Information relates to you.
Privacy of children
We do not knowingly collect any Personal Information from children under the age of 18. If you are under the age of 18, please do not submit any Personal Information through the Website and Services. We encourage parents and legal guardians to monitor their children’s Internet usage and to help enforce this Policy by instructing their children never to provide Personal Information through the Website and Services without their permission. If you have reason to believe that a child under the age of 18 has provided Personal Information to us through the Website and Services, please contact us.
Cookies
The Website and Services use “cookies” to help personalize your online experience. A cookie is a text file that is placed on your hard disk by a web server. Cookies cannot be used to run programs or deliver viruses to your computer. Cookies are uniquely assigned to you, and can only be read by a web server in the domain that issued the cookie to you.
We may use cookies to collect, store, and track information for statistical purposes to operate the Website and Services. You have the ability to accept or decline cookies. Most web browsers automatically accept cookies, but you can usually modify your browser setting to decline cookies if you prefer.
Do Not Track signals
Some browsers incorporate a Do Not Track feature that signals to websites you visit that you do not want to have your online activity tracked. Tracking is not the same as using or collecting information in connection with a website. For these purposes, tracking refers to collecting personally identifiable information from consumers who use or visit a website or online service as they move across different websites over time. How browsers communicate the Do Not Track signal is not yet uniform. As a result, the Website and Services are not yet set up to interpret or respond to Do Not Track signals communicated by your browser. Even so, as described in more detail throughout this Policy, we limit our use and collection of your Personal Information.
Advertisements
We may permit certain third-party companies to help us tailor advertising that we think may be of interest to users and to collect and use other data about user activities on the Website. These companies may deliver ads that might place cookies and otherwise track user behavior.
Email marketing
We offer electronic newsletters to which you may voluntarily subscribe at any time. We are committed to keeping your e-mail address confidential and will not disclose your email address to any third parties except as described in this Policy or for the purposes of utilizing a third-party provider to send such emails. We will maintain the information sent via e-mail in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.
In compliance with email marketing laws such as the CAN-SPAM Act, all e-mails sent from us will clearly state who the e-mail is from and provide clear information on how to contact us. You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails or by contacting us.
The Website and Services may contain links to other resources that are not owned or controlled by us. Please be aware that we are not responsible for the privacy practices of such other resources or third parties. We encourage you to be aware when you leave the Website and Services and to read the privacy statements of each and every resource that may collect Personal Information.
Information security
We secure information you provide on computer servers in a controlled, secure environment, protected from unauthorized access, use, or disclosure. We maintain reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards in an effort to protect against unauthorized access, use, modification, and disclosure of Personal Information in our control and custody. However, no data transmission over the Internet or wireless network can be guaranteed. Therefore, while we strive to protect your Personal Information, you acknowledge that (i) there are security and privacy limitations of the Internet which are beyond our control; (ii) the security, integrity, and privacy of any and all information and data exchanged between you and the Website cannot be guaranteed; and (iii) any such information and data may be viewed or tampered with in transit by a third party, despite best efforts.
Data breach
In the event we become aware that the security of the Website and Services has been compromised or users’ Personal Information has been disclosed to unrelated third parties as a result of external activity, including, but not limited to, security attacks or fraud, we reserve the right to take reasonably appropriate measures, including, but not limited to, investigation and reporting, as well as notification to and cooperation with law enforcement authorities. In the event of a data breach, we will make reasonable efforts to notify affected individuals if we believe that there is a reasonable risk of harm to the user as a result of the breach or if notice is otherwise required by law. When we do, we will post a notice on the Website, or send you an email.
Changes and amendments
We reserve the right to modify this Policy or its terms relating to the Website and Services from time to time at our discretion and will notify you of any material changes to the way in which we treat Personal Information. When we do, we will revise the updated date at the bottom of this page. We may also provide notice to you in other ways at our discretion, such as through the contact information you have provided. Any updated version of this Policy will be effective immediately upon the posting of the revised Policy unless otherwise specified. Your continued use of the Website and Services after the effective date of the revised Policy (or such other act specified at that time) will constitute your consent to those changes. However, we will not, without your consent, use your Personal Information in a manner materially different from what was stated at the time your Personal Information was collected.
Acceptance of this policy
You acknowledge that you have read this Policy and agree to all its terms and conditions. By accessing and using the Website and Services you agree to be bound by this Policy. If you do not agree to abide by the terms of this Policy, you are not authorized to access or use the Website and Services.
Enforcement
Tealium undertakes to verify compliance with this Policy not less than once per year and in connection with Tealium’s annual review and internal compliance measures. Tealium will use its best commercial efforts to ensure that compliance with this Policy is maintained and that this Policy is accurate, comprehensive, and continues to conform to applicable law. We encourage you to raise and discuss any issues or concerns with Tealium’s Data Privacy Officer directly. Our DPO will address and resolve such complaints regarding the use of data and noncompliance with our Policy.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Tealium commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Tealium is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC)
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. With respect to personal data received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework.
Tealium may disclose personal data in response to lawful requests from public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Contacting us
If you would like to contact us to understand more about this Policy or wish to contact us concerning any matter relating to individual rights and your Personal Information, you may do so via the contact form https://tealium.com/contact/. You can also email us at
privacy@tealium.com
or
dpo@tealium.com
. You can also write us at:
Tealium Inc.
9605 Scranton Road, Suite 600,
San Diego CA 92121
Attn: Legal Department
Privacy Settings
In order to offer you the best possible experience, we share your personal data with third-party technology. This includes technologies necessary for the operation of the website as well as others used solely for analysis purposes, to display personalized content or for profiling purposes. You can decide which categories you want to allow.
Sub-policy 9
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-us:
This is the Trace Id: 3e67c370f0658ce19c4c805ef42cd737
Privacy at Microsoft
Your data is private at work, at home, and on the go
Our commitment to privacy
We ground our privacy commitments in strong data governance practices, so you can trust that we'll protect the privacy and confidentiality of your data and will only use it in a way that's consistent with the reasons you provided it.
You control your information
We give you the ability to control your data, along with clear and meaningful choices over how your data is used.
Your data is protected
We rigorously protect your data using encryption and other security best practices.
You can expect privacy by design
We design our products with a core commitment to uphold user privacy.
We stand up for your rights
We fight for stronger privacy laws and protections, and will protect your rights if a government request is made for data.
Discover and control your data
Privacy is at the center of how we build the products and services that customers use every day. See privacy resources and controls below where you can manage your data and how it is used.
Visit your privacy dashboard
The privacy dashboard is where you can manage your privacy settings and manage your data for your Microsoft account.
Account check-up
The account check-up wizard is a tool where you can review your account safety settings to strengthen your online security.
Find your privacy controls
Learn how to find your privacy settings and other related information in Microsoft products and services.
Data protection for your business
For enterprise and business customers, IT admins, or anyone using Microsoft products at work, visit the Microsoft Trust Center to get information about privacy and security practices in our products and services.
Microsoft Trust Center
Learn more about privacy at Microsoft
Learn more about Privacy at Microsoft and how we put our privacy principles into practice in the following links and resources.
Privacy Statement
Your privacy is important to us. The privacy statement explains the personal data Microsoft processes, how Microsoft processes it, and for what purposes.
Privacy for Young People
Privacy for young people is a page where young users can learn about and understand Microsoft's privacy practices and how to use our products in a way that protects their privacy. This page also highlights topics that may be helpful for parents and guardians.
Privacy Report
The privacy report includes new developments in privacy at Microsoft. Find the latest information on what personal data we collect, how it may be used, and how you can manage and control your data.
Privacy Frequently Asked Questions
Do you have a question about Microsoft privacy? We explain how customers can export or delete personal data and more in the Privacy FAQs.
Microsoft Corporate Social Responsibility
Learn more about how Microsoft approaches building a more inclusive, equitable, sustainable, and trusted future for everyone, and how technology can and must benefit the future of humanity and our planet.
U.S. State Data Privacy Notice
If you are in the U.S, please see our U.S State Data Privacy Notice.
What's new?
Check out the latest articles, blog posts, and news from Microsoft about protecting your privacy at home and at work.
GDPR and generative AI - a guide for the public sector
This whitepaper offers practical support for public sector organizations as they consider generative AI services such as Copilot for Microsoft 365 and Azure OpenAI Service. Discover how public sector organizations can harness the power of generative AI while complying with their obligations under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
Protecting the data of our commercial and public sector customers in the AI era
Learn more about Microsoft’s commitment to protecting the data of our commercial and public sector customers and how our approach to AI is built on a foundation of privacy across all our AI products and solutions.
Enhancing trust and protecting privacy in the AI era
Discover how Microsoft’s privacy commitments apply to AI and how Microsoft empowers customers to use new AI technologies while advancing trust and protecting privacy.
Microsoft Cloud enables customers to keep personal data within the European Data Boundary
Microsoft’s EU Data Boundary enables customers to store and process their data within the EU. Read about the latest enhancements and new features building on prior progress.
Contact our team
If you have a privacy concern, request or question,
please contact us